Chapter 51.

“Ung… umm…”

 

Ulrich sighed as he watched her still clumsily pressing her lips against his, unable to do anything but rub insistently.

 

Through the wide-open door, Lisbell’s moist tongue cautiously pushed in as if testing the waters. Enjoying the sensation of her tongue scraping against his teeth, Ulrich quietly lowered his arms and lifted her neat skirt that fell to her knees.

 

As he touched her prominent kneecap and trailed his hand up her slender thigh, Lisbell immediately responded.

 

Her skin twitched as if sparks were flying, but she did not resist much. She merely occasionally curled her tongue inside her mouth and exhaled hot breaths that seemed almost scorching.

 

Still tipsy, Ulrich felt as if he was drinking along with her and savored it sweetly.

 

“Theo, I’m sorry…”

 



 

“I’m sorry, so don’t go… Huh, yeah…?”

 

Just as he started to feel her pleasantly licking the inside of his cheek, Lisbell suddenly clung to his clothes and pleaded. It was obvious that her trembling eyes behind tightly shut eyelids resembled a trapped herbivore.

 

“Where am I going?”

 

“Don’t go… I, uh, I lied…”

 

“What lie?”

 

“I said I, uh… don’t love you anymore.”

 



 

“But actually, the truth is, I still…”

 

“Do you love me?”

 



 

“Do you love me?”

 

Lisbell slowly opened her eyes towards the deep darkness.

 

Her trembling hand clutched his coat, recognizing him only by his silhouette. Ulrich gazed down at her under the same circumstances.

 

The only difference was that her vision was blurred by drunkenness, whereas he was sober.

 

Ulrich wondered if she might sober up now. If she did, he was curious about how she would react.

 

Probably, her face would turn pale, and she would push him away in disgust, treating him like a germ, crawling away from him even if it meant crawling on all fours.

 

Watching her react like that, he thought it wouldn’t be bad to strip her skirt and immediately thrust into her. If he thrust deeply, spanking her buttocks while hitting her most sensitive spots, she would squirm and spill clear fluid like urine.

 

Her face and other features would turn as red as her heated hole from the thrusting, bringing out her most erotic side. This too seemed not a bad idea.

 

“I love you…”

 



 

“This too, this too is sincere…”

 

Her weak voice, which had been trailing off like a loose thread, was now quite clear.

 

Ulrich looked down at her innocent face, pouring out a heartfelt confession to the wrong person.

 

The kiss resumed urgently. This time, it was Ulrich who initiated it.

 

Lisbell, seemingly startled by his uncharacteristic boldness, soon sweetly accepted his intruding tongue like a piece of sugar.

 

Wet sounds leaked from the slightly parted and then rejoined lips. The mingling saliva loudly testified to how lustfully the two small pieces of flesh were rubbing against each other.

 

“Lift your hips.”

 

Ulrich, nibbling on her tongue, murmured as he pushed his arm towards her buttocks. Lisbell, exhaling roughly, cautiously complied with the command. While doing so, she carefully grasped his dark arm.

 

“Why, but, huh…?”

 



 

“Your way of speaking, uh, since a while ago…?”

 

Ulrich, who had been removing her lower garments with quiet efficiency, raised his eyebrows slightly.

 

“Way of speaking?”

 

“You don’t usually use formal speech… but you keep…”

 

It seemed she was caught on an irrelevant point. Even amidst this, her inability to sober up was indeed remarkable.

 

She had said before that she was quite weak to alcohol. The whiskey stocked in the villa was strong enough to make even heavy drinkers like him feel lightheaded, so it must have easily pushed her to the brink of unconsciousness.

 

As a result, even now, rubbing her lower abdomen obscenely, she accepted it without any resistance.

 

“Should I stop?”

 

Ulrich asked as he stroked her soft pubic hair hidden in her underwear.

 

Lisbell frowned slightly but soon returned to her dazed state.

 

“Yeah…”

 

“Why?”

 

“Because it keeps, keeps reminding me.”

 

“Reminding you of what?”

 

“Of someone I don’t like…”

 



 

“That man keeps…”

 

He couldn’t help but laugh in disbelief.

 

She had no idea that she was rubbing bodies with the very person she claimed to dislike, right before intercourse. If she knew, she wouldn’t be tangled up like this in the dim bedroom.

 

Suppressing a reflexive laugh, Ulrich whispered, “That’s too much.”

 

“…Yeah?”

 

“Then, if you don’t like it…”

 

Ulrich’s hand slowly withdrew from her lower body, where he had made room for entry. His elegantly outlined hand grabbed his own trousers. The act of unbuttoning in the dark was vivid enough to stir tension.

 

He licked his dry lips and left a brief kiss on the corner of Lisbell’s mouth.

 

“Then I’ll just thrust it in.”

 

His trousers were fully undone. With one gesture, he pulled out his stiff, engorged erect!on. The reddish, swollen head of his cock threatened as it bobbed against his firm abs.

 

As he grasped the blunt tip and rubbed it, pre-cum had already started to trickle down. From the moment she started her misguided declaration of love, he had been aching down there.

 

“Umm… ung.”

 

Suppressing the softly struggling Lisbell with his body, he pressed their lips together again. Every time he softly licked her alternating lips, her belly button trembled.

 

Ulrich spread her legs a bit more and removed her skirt and underwear, revealing her wet vulva. He pressed his cock against her smooth entrance and rubbed it.

 

“Haa…”

 

“Ugh… yeah… ah…”

 

Instead of immediately penetrating, he rubbed the soft entrance. As his veined surface stimulated her, Lisbell twisted her waist and moaned.

 

Ulrich grabbed her wriggling buttocks, deepening the intimate contact between their gen!talia. As he raised her arousal, her flesh softened, and she began to show moistness.

 

Meanwhile, his lips were not idle either. He persistently found and sucked her tongue that kept trying to hide, stealing her breath in an obscene manner.

 

Ulrich felt as if he was getting drunk himself.

 

The more he plunged his tongue into her mouth and stole her sticky breath and saliva, the more his rational mind was overlaid with hazy heat.

 

“Haa, haa.”

 

Moaning and writhing, Lisbell did not resist. She might truly believe tonight is her first night with her fiancé.

 

Ulrich chuckled darkly.

 

Knowing that he was about to take both her real and fake first night, he already pictured her reaction when she found out later.

 

Would she cry, get angry, feel desolate, or despair? The various possibilities were already a delightful plaything.

 

“Hoo…”

 

Even so, he sighed deeply.

 

The tantalizing play was reaching its limit.


After several sessions of !ntercourse, the opening widened without much resistance, despite the gentle pressure pushing in. It had only been pressed a few times between the tender flesh, but already his entire shaft was sticky with fluids.

 

Now it was time to thoroughly beat it with his arm, swollen to the size of a forearm.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Startled, Lisbell grabbed the sheets tightly with both hands and squeezed her buttocks as Ulrich suddenly flipped her over.

 

Ulrich pulled her lower body closer, making it stick tightly. Then, he naturally took a position from behind, spreading her buttocks apart. He saw the wet hole below the tender flesh, sticking to his palm, glistening with moisture.

 

Before entering, he stretched it from side to side. Over time, the previously tight contraction had eased a bit, and the previously soft color had darkened slightly.

 

It was a satisfying change.

 

As he wondered if this would one day become stained like a mark he personally left, Ulrich thrust his wet center inside all at once.

 

“…Ah…!”

 

Despite being soaked, it was quite a struggle to push it all the way to the base.

 

Ulrich pushed deep into the tight inner walls with pure strength. The inner walls, forcibly opened, trembled with slight spasms.

 

Then, he adjusted to the rounded buttocks, thrusting rhythmically, causing the inside to tremble wildly.

 

“Ah, ah, ah…!”

 

Lisbell instinctively swayed her hips, rubbing her forehead against the sheet. It was uncharacteristic of her.

 

Perhaps she was mistaken in thinking that the one penetrating her was her fiancé, but being intoxicated itself was likely bringing unexpected exhilaration. Good sex even when sober can be enhanced with the addition of alcohol or drugs.

 

There was no need to make her turn her face this way to confirm. Not only her lewd appearance but the change in the inner flesh as it received him indicated that she was willing.

 

Today, after only a bit of initial resistance, the rhythmical piston movement was not difficult at all.

 

Her insides tightened perfectly, squeezing the flesh pleasingly with every thrust. Ulrich held her pale buttocks in both hands, fingers gripping tightly, and rapidly bounced his hips.

 

“Wait, just a moment…!”

 

The act was paused briefly.

 

Lisbell, gripping the sheet like a lifeline, reached back to hold Ulrich. Or rather, it was more of a pushing motion than a grasping one.

 

Ulrich stared blankly at the long, slender fingers resting on him. For a brief moment, he felt a violent impulse to break each finger that was hindering this rapid pleasure.

 

“I don’t like this, Theo…”

 

“You don’t like it?”

 

No way.

 

Ulrich, with a sneer, slammed his pen!s deep, making a loud noise, as if questioning how she could say she didn’t like it when she was greedily sucking it in. Lisbell flailed like a fish out of water.

 

“Ah! This position, I hate it! Please…!”

 

Ulrich’s powerful thrusts paused.

 

Even in this situation, Lisbell, unable to control her limbs due to the overwhelming pleasure, collapsed forward with a wet voice.

 

“It reminds me of him. I hate this position…”

 



 

“I don’t want to think of him while I’m with you…”

 



 

“So, please… please…”

 

In short, she was asking him to stop using the position that reminded her of intercourse with him, not to stop the sex altogether.

 

Ulrich, initially unresponsive, let out a quiet laugh.

 

With eyes that were hot yet cold, like ice within flames, he looked down at her thin back and flipped her over to a straight position, grabbing her knees.

 

Following her trembling body, the loosely tied necktie fluttered. He grabbed it, pulling her neck slightly towards him.

 

“Is this what you want?”

 

Without knowing who she was with, she was making demands like this.

 

Even as he thought this, Ulrich complied with Lisbell’s request. It was a small pleasure saved for later. For now, she only associated certain positions with him, but eventually, she would think of him regardless of the position, marking her deeply.

 

“Is this good?”

 

“Yes, ugh, ah…!”

 

“Do you like it, facing me like this?”

 

Resuming the rhythmic thrusts in the new position, Lisbell’s face flushed deeper red, moving aimlessly.

 

So stupid.

 

Despite his mocking thoughts, Ulrich felt an uncontrollable heat rising.

 

He grabbed her behind the knees, lifting her lower body and thrusting upwards. The thin, wet pubic hair stuck annoyingly to both her crotch and his groin, adding to the irritating sensation.

 

“Do you like it? Huh?”

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

“Answer, Lisbell.”

 

“Yes, I like it… Ah…!”

 

“Then say you love me again.”

 

“Uh, ah, ah…!”

 

“Say it again. Come on…”

 

Slowing his thrusts deliberately, he urged her. Lisbell clung to him more tightly, embracing him with her whole body.

 

Lightly kissing her nose and flushed cheeks, he prompted her again, and Lisbell, perhaps mistaking his tender manner for that of her fiancé, whimpered.

 

“I love you, Theo. I love you…”

 

Ulrich couldn’t suppress a laughter bubbling up from his core. He kissed her tongue, wrapping it around his own, then whispered softly in her ear.

 

“But I’m not Theo.”

 

“Uh…? Uh?”

 

“Do you still love me?”

 

Lisbell panted heavily. He increased his pace as soon as he threw out the unsettling question. Penetrating deeply into the wet hole, Lisbell clung to him, her body convulsing.

 

Even as she was overwhelmed by pleasure, her eyes darted upward, unable to ignore his strange words.

 

Ulrich covered her eyes with his hand and continued thrusting into the soft, concave spot inside. His heavy, tight scrotum was already pulling taut. Today’s sex was strangely enjoyable, and the urge to climax was approaching faster than usual.

 

“Theo… Theo…?”

 

“Yes, I’m here.”

 

“Theo… ugh, ah…!”

 

“I’m here, Lisbell…”

 

Giggling, he teased her with exaggerated affection.

 

Toying with her deliberately, he focused all his energy on thrusting, as if to completely dominate her. Holding her slender waist, he pushed her up strongly.

 

Lisbell felt it acutely every time he grazed towards her navel. She particularly enjoyed it when he targeted that area from behind.

 

“Ah, Theo! Theo!”

 

“Is it good with Theo, huh? Does your fiancé’s dick feel that different?”

 

Under normal circumstances, she would have felt something was off, but unfortunately, Lisbell was too far gone to notice. With her mind muddled by potent intoxication and the burning heat inside her, she couldn’t harbor any doubts and clung to him.

 

Through the blurry, swaying vision, she saw only darkness.

 

Whatever form it took, in her sorrow-stricken eyes after losing her fiancé, it was perceived only as Theodore returning to her.


“Theo, Theo, ah, just a little more… uh, ah, ah!”

 

The rapid and forceful invasion at the entrance quickened. Lisbell became like a nail being hammered, her body trembling as she curled inward. Ulrich persistently pushed into her and whispered in her ear.

 

“Can I do it inside?”

 

“Uh, huff, huh…? Ah! Ah…!”

 

“Lisbell, inside you… ha….”

 

“Huff, ah….”

 

“We’re going to get married anyway, right?”

 

He asked in a tone so gentle and desperate that Lisbell, caught off guard, nodded while clinging to his neck.

 

Ulrich’s smile, caught at the corners of his lips, darkened like a shadow in a shaded corner.

 

“You gave me permission.”

 

Ulrich, who held her ankles apart and aligned below, thrust passionately. Lisbell, unable to even swallow her saliva, rubbed the back of her head against the sheet, crying out.

 

The squelching sound continued between their hips.

 

The inside, which had loosened up, clung to the shaft as if pleading not to let go, then barely returned to its place, repeating this pattern. Each time the intense coupling that felt like it would pull her insides out continued, wet traces spurted everywhere.

 

“Ah, ah, aaah…! Uh-huh!”

 

Lost in the sensuality squeezing her entire body, Lisbell reached the pinnacle that struck her brain sharply. The woman’s piercing moans, which had been quite sharp, gradually faded and then died away.

 

Meanwhile, Ulrich wrapped the tie around her neck in his hand and pulled.

 

Kissing her deeply, he accelerated to the final speed.

 

Pressing firmly against her thigh, already marked by light abrasions from the constant contact, he forcefully thrust his glans up to her cervix.

 

“Hmm…!”

 

As the act subsided, Lisbell, unable to swallow her saliva, wandered the air with unfocused pupils, reaching another climax. Ulrich, watching her messy appearance, ejaculated.

 

As she had wished, his body shook with satisfaction, and Lisbell’s convulsions, nearly at the level of shivering, subsided. Her arms and legs also lost all strength.

 

Now, completely limp, she breathed softly, as if finally falling into a sleep she could not escape.

 

Her gray hair, disheveled, covered the side of her face. Watching this, Ulrich leaned forward. He finally took a mouthful of her fluttering hair, sucking it gently like he had with her lips earlier, then slowly let it go.

 

“Hmm.”

 

It wasn’t particularly tasty. The texture was what he enjoyed. Earlier, it had clung to his fingers, and now it clung to his tongue, the unfamiliar sensation feeling fresh. It seemed he could chew it playfully whenever he was bored.

 

But Ulrich thought of something else.

 

Letting go of the hair, his lips naturally moved to bite Lisbell’s lips.

 

Already asleep, her lips parted easily with the slightest touch. The willingness and innocence, still recognizing him as her fiancé, were both gratifying and annoying.

 

Suppressing a chuckle, he filled her mouth with his tongue. Biting her swollen lips until they puffed up, he slowly withdrew. Grabbing her limp legs, he hoisted them over his shoulder, realigning their connection.

 

The smell of alcohol lingering in the air was almost gone. Ulrich’s nerves, now fully alert, could only detect Lisbell’s body scent. Perhaps it was because of the hair he had just chewed.

 

Accepting it gladly, he adjusted his posture. He then carefully undressed her one by one.

 

He didn’t bother to remove the tie around her naked body.

 

Whenever he felt unsatisfied, he would pull and loosen the tie in his hand.

 

Even in her sleep, Lisbell occasionally coughed lightly, feeling the physical pressure. Each time, he would smile sweetly and quicken his pace a little more.

 

***

 

She had developed a habit of waking up, counting the hours of the night, not knowing when she had fallen asleep. It was always like this in the morning.

 

Lisbell, lying on her side, quietly rolled her half-open eyes.

 

When did I come back to this room?

 

As she wandered through these thoughts, fragmented memories floated to the surface. And when those memories finally turned into the image of Theodore crying with his head on her lap, Lisbell held her breath.

 



 

That’s right.

 

Yesterday, Lisbell had notified her fiancé of their breakup. It was truly a unilateral and disgraceful manner. After that, she had guarded her mother’s sickbed, unable to bear it any longer, and intended to return to her room. During this process, through the crack of an accidentally opened door….

 

Ah, alcohol.

 

She remembered coming back to this bedroom and drinking directly from the bottle without a glass. No wonder her head had been splitting with pain.

 

What’s this… a tie?

 

She noticed several things in succession. A tie draped over her completely naked body, and a man’s arm resting across her waist.

 

She became aware of the soft breathing against her back.

 

When did this man arrive?

 

There was no memory of Ulrich in the last scene she remembered. She had been drinking alone in this bed. Though she didn’t know what had happened, her entire body felt achy as if she had been tossed around.

 

Lisbell let out a small groan and twisted her body, only to freeze. Goosebumps ran up her stiffened back.

 

It’s still… inside.

 

As soon as she moved her lower body slightly, it felt sticky between her buttocks. Once conscious of it, the foreign sensation became overwhelmingly uncomfortable. The reason for the unusually tight position was clear. Ulrich’s member was still inside her.

 

Revulsion and fear simultaneously washed over her. The thought that she might have been like this all night made her feel sick, and the physical strain of being spread out for so long scared her.

 

Lisbell bit her lip hard enough to draw blood and cautiously lifted her upper body. She slowly moved forward.

 

“Huff….”

 

Despite her efforts to stay silent, a faint moan escaped. The heavy flesh slid out slowly, laden with the foam that had built up overnight. The empty space inside her throbbed and ached from the prolonged friction. Dampness oozed out. Startled, Lisbell quickly wiped between her legs with her palm.

 



 

Her hand was smeared with a sticky liquid, resembling a mix of milk and oil. Lisbell stared down at the evidence, bewildered.

 

“Mm.”

 

Just then, the man beside her stirred, unknowingly draping his arm over his forehead. Ulrich, yawning and still half-asleep, opened his pale eyelashes.

 

He reached out to Lisbell, who was sitting there staring at her hand in disbelief, and lightly touched the long tie hanging diagonally down her body. She jolted awake and turned her head.

 

“Why… are you here?”

 

“Don’t you remember?”

 



 

“Of course not. You drank an entire bottle.”

 

He added that it was stronger than she had thought, then slowly sat up.

 

His eyes, usually docile, looked even more droopy with lingering sleepiness. He yawned again and ruffled his messy platinum hair. Lisbell, staring blankly at his face, spoke.

 

“Clearly….”

 

“Hmm?”

 

“Clearly, we agreed not to….”

 

Mentioning the contract clause prohibiting internal ejaculation, Ulrich, realizing the source of the traces, let out a lazy laugh.

 

Propping himself up with a cushion, he started to look for a cigarette, then remembered this was her bedroom and stopped.

 

“You gave me permission, Lisbell. You said I could do it inside.”

 



 

“Ah, you probably don’t remember that either.”

 

He removed the blanket covering his lower body and got out of bed. Stretching leisurely, he ignored the crumpled shirt and put on his pants. As he buckled up, he noticed her still staring at her palm helplessly and chuckled.

 

“And it doesn’t matter anymore, does it?”

 



 

“I saw yesterday that you’re completely done with Mr. Motier.”


Those words struck a nerve with Lisbell, who had been struggling to regain her composure. She lowered her hand, which she had been keeping suspended awkwardly, and wiped it on the blanket. Though the marks disappeared quickly, she still felt uneasy, as if something muddy was clinging to her.

 

Moreover, the inexplicable tie around her neck was another source of discomfort. It was definitely “his” tie. Lisbell was about to impatiently remove it when he spoke.

 

“Were you the one who wanted to break off the engagement first?”

 



 

“Or did you suggest it?”

 

“It’s unrelated to this.”

 



 

“I hope this kind of thing doesn’t happen again.”

 

“Why?”

 



 

“Afraid you might get pregnant?”

 

Lisbell refrained from answering and stood up. With a lingering hangover and the recent breakup with Theodore still fresh, she had no energy to deal with the man in front of her. She just wanted to rush into the bathroom and wash off her tainted body.

 

As Ulrich approached the curtained window, he spoke to her retreating back.

 

“Wash up and come down to the dining room. Let’s eat together.”

 

“…I’m not in the mood.”

 

“Come down anyway.”

 

“I said I’m not in the mood.”

 

“Do I seem like I’m making a suggestion?”

 

Lisbell bit her lip hard.

 

Walking along the window, he methodically drew back the curtains. The room, which had been dark the previous night, was now flooded with light. Despite the bright scene, Lisbell seemed about to collapse, while the man stood comfortably, basking in the morning sunlight, and spoke cheerfully.

 

“I have something to tell you.”

 

“Then tell me here….”

 

“While we eat. Lisbell, you’ll feel worse if you stay on an empty stomach after drinking so much last night. You need to eat something.”

 

She knew well enough that his occasional kindness was just a facade. Lisbell no longer fell for it.

 



 

“If you really don’t want to… I’ll just have to visit that bedroom where your mother is lying down. You’re always there, after all.”

 

Lisbell’s face hardened with rejection. Smiling flawlessly, Ulrich picked up the tie from the bed. Only after clutching it did he leave the room as if his business was finished.

 

Lisbell immediately headed to the bathroom and turned on the faucet. The water cascaded over her body, washing every corner.

 

But she didn’t feel cleansed. Instead, she felt more suffocated. Standing under the hot water until her skin was thoroughly warmed, she finally stepped out after a long while.

 

After washing, she checked the clock on the table.

 

Her headache persisted, and her stomach felt uneasy. She wanted nothing more than to collapse onto the bed and sleep. But she couldn’t do that without knowing what he meant by having something to say.

 

If it concerned her mother, avoiding it was pointless. Besides, he said he’d come to her mother’s bedroom if she didn’t go….

 

Suppressing a groan, Lisbell rummaged through the closet.

 

Half of it was filled with thin slips Ulrich had his secretary stock without her consent. Pushing them aside disdainfully, she selected a clean outfit. It was just her usual neat blouse and a long flare skirt that covered her legs.

 

She considered tying her damp hair, but feeling too lazy, she left the bedroom.

 

As she entered the dining room, the rich aroma of warm soup filled the air. Ulrich approached and set a pre-served bowl of soup before her as she sat down.

 

He too seemed to have washed, with his hair slightly damp, and wore a light gown suitable for indoors. Lisbell glanced at the steaming soup, then watched him pick up his fork.

 

“What is it you need to say?”

 

“Just eat first.”

 

“Tell me, and I’ll eat.”

 

“Do I need to feed you directly?”

 



 

“Are you a baby?”

 

Annoyed by his words, Lisbell picked up the spoon. She didn’t want to give in, but his taunts were grating. If she kept resisting, he might really grab her and force the hot soup into her mouth.

 

The mere thought exhausted her, so she reluctantly took a spoonful of the soup. It was fortunately palatable. She’d noted before how surprisingly good the food was, considering it was for someone like him.

 

“I need to visit the capital in a few days.”

 

He finally got to the point as she started eating. Lisbell’s hand paused. She looked up quickly. Ulrich met her unexpected gaze as he lit a cigarette.

 

“I have an unmissable appointment.”

 



 

“Your mother’s treatment will continue as usual. Nothing will change except my absence. But I thought you should know.”

 

“When will you be back?”

 

“Why are you curious?”

 



 

“Planning to run away?”

 

Lisbell’s grip on the spoon tightened. Her gaze dropped.

 

“How could I run away?”

 



 

“Mother hasn’t regained consciousness.”

 

“If you really wanted to, you could.”

 



 

“Though, I suppose there’s no need to try so hard now. You’re completely done with Mr. Motier.”

 

The soup that had been manageable moments ago now felt nauseating. Every time Ulrich intentionally brought up Theodore, it made her feel sick. It was like her Achilles’ heel was being cruelly exposed.

 

“Is that all you needed to say?”

 

She put down the spoon with a clatter and stood up, only to be yanked back into the chair by her arm. The grip was so strong it hurt, and Lisbell frowned in pain.

 

“Do you really not remember anything from last night?”

 

“…Ugh.”

 

“You melted my heart completely.”

 

Seeing Lisbell’s pained face, he slowly released her arm and gently rubbed the spot. As he exhaled cigarette smoke, he murmured.

 

“Did you know you told me you loved me last night?”

 

Lisbell’s eyes widened in disbelief.

 

“You said it several times.”

 



 

“Several times….”

 

His lazy voice spread through the smoke, as if savoring the memory.

 

Lisbell realized his malicious intent to force her to recall a night she didn’t want to remember, which she couldn’t recall anyway.

 

“…Didn’t you learn that taking advantage of a drunk person is unworthy of a gentleman?”

 

Ulrich’s eyes slowly returned to her. His gaze, intense and fiery, couldn’t be ignored. Lisbell instinctively drew her knees together.

 

“You grabbed me first.”

 



 

“You clung to me, crying and begging me not to leave.”

 



 

“Ah, didn’t I mention? I’m weak against your crying face.”

 

Both possibilities existed.

 

He could be lying to mess with her, or she could have really clung to him in her drunken state. If only her memory were clear, she would know instantly, but the events of last night were a blank. The more she tried to recall, the worse her headache got. It was a severe hangover.

 

“Even if I did… You should have ignored it as drunken behavior.”

 

“You kissed me first, you know. Don’t you remember?”

 

“You should have just left me alone and walked out.”

 

“You kissed me several times. You even used your tongue first.”

 



 

“Hugging my neck… begging me not to leave while wrapping your legs around my waist.”

 

She couldn’t listen any longer.

 

“I didn’t think it was you!” Lisbell gasped, her eyes filled with resentment.


Even if what he said was true, nothing would change.

 

It was probably because she was drunk and mistook him for Theodore that she acted so disgracefully.

 

Last night, the man who pretended to be her fiancé in the cover of pitch-black darkness was none other than Ulrich Altahart. Now, just the thought of him made her feel repulsed, someone she could never have good feelings for. No matter what, that wouldn’t change.

 

“If it were you.”

 



 

“If I knew it was you, I never would have….”

 

She wouldn’t have done it.

 

The words choked with sobs were swallowed down and never came out.

 

It was truly a cursed night.

 

No matter how hard she tried to ignore it, her constant recollections of last night kept making her think of Theodore.

 

After telling him the lie that she no longer loved him and announcing the breakup, she couldn’t console him as he cried on her lap, cowardly standing by as he wept. She just sat there, watching as he completely left, feeling like she was hanging herself in this prison-like villa.

 

It was a sort of torture, constantly being reminded that the future she had tried so hard to protect was shattered to pieces.

 

Lisbell wiped away the tears running down her cheeks. From the other side, she heard the sound of someone clicking their tongue.

 

“Change your mind a little.”

 



 

“Now that you no longer have a fiancé to feel guilty about, you don’t need to be so distressed. Last night, Lisbell, you felt good enough holding onto me. Honestly, it felt good, didn’t it? You cried and climaxed so many times with me….”

 



 

“If your fiancé is gone, shouldn’t you be able to enjoy yourself a bit more?”

 

Lisbell felt dizzy.

 

His words were really hard to understand. Did he think that the reason she found this relationship difficult was simply because of guilt towards her fiancé?

 

Close, but not entirely correct.

 

Ulrich viewed relationships between people too simplistically and superficially. He didn’t consider the inner depths, only the external factors, defining cause and effect based on that alone.

 

Lisbell realized this after a moment.

 

“You…”

 

Her voice was dry and sounded like metal.

 

She looked out the window. The sky, which had been clear for several days, seemed a bit dimmer. The green leaves on the branches were slightly discolored at the edges.

 

Late summer was ending.

 

It was a sign that cool autumn was coming.

 

“You’ve never loved anyone, have you?”

 



 

“That’s why you can say things like that….”

 

There was a time when she hoped that everything might end after summer passed. Standing in front of the autumn that had finally arrived, she realized how futile that hope was.

 

Her mother was still the same, and the future she dreamed of with Theodore had completely crumbled.

 

So, what was she doing here now?

 

“Love?”

 

Ulrich stood up.

 

He grabbed Lisbell’s arm, who was staring off into the distance. Her slender body was forcibly pulled up and pushed onto the dining table. Ulrich pushed away the soup bowl that was barely touched. The sound of the chair falling and the bowl shattering on the floor mixed together messily. Her hearing seemed to fail her as everything crumbled.

 

“Why bother with something so childish and tiring?”

 

Ulrich flipped her flare skirt up. Feeling her underwear being pulled down to her ankles in an instant, Lisbell bit her lip. Her buttocks, bruised from his grasp last night, were spread apart.

 

“Like this.”

 

He undid the cord roughly tied around his waist and pulled out his erect!on, rubbing it against Lisbell’s dry vulva.

 

The foreplay was short. As if to vent his displeasure, he thrust into her dry vag!na.

 

“…Ah…!”

 

“There’s a hole you can spread whenever you want… ha, anyway.”

 

A deep breath escaped his lips. Lisbell tightened her lower abdomen. Despite feeling a distinctly different pressure from last night, Ulrich persistently moved his hips.

 

“Ah, ah, uh…. “

 

From the woman underneath him came dry moans, different from the sweet ones of the night before.

 

Even so, once a body was accustomed to pleasure, it couldn’t easily forget that overwhelming sensation. As he scraped inside her with his engorged shaft, her inner walls reluctantly released moisture reflexively.

 

Ulrich continued his increasingly slick thrusts, raising his eyes.

 

Her hair, not tied up, covered her face again. He brushed it away, tucking it behind her ear. Her delicate profile was revealed. Ulrich stared intensely at her vacant, purple eyes and thrusted deeply, smiling lazily.

 

“Ah, as I thought.”

 

“Ugh, ah…”

 

“You’re the prettiest when you cry and moan absentmindedly.”

 

Lisbell gripped the tablecloth tightly.

 

His words, meant to shatter her pride, made her feel resigned rather than angry. Reality still coldly surrounded her. No matter what feelings she had towards this man, she couldn’t escape this situation.

 

Even if one side’s love was broken, as long as the other side’s love remained….

 

Unless she found a perfect way to take her mother out of his grasp, there was no other choice.

 

With every passionate thrust from behind, her vision shook. It felt like she was being plunged to the bottom of the sea. Perhaps it was the pressure on her chest making it hard to breathe.

 

Lisbell, staring weakly to the side, slowly closed her eyes.

 

What am I….

 

So, what am I doing now….

 

***

 

The boulevard decorating the Laurent Square in the capital was already painted with the reds and yellows of autumn.

 

The ballroom of the Alstard Hotel, adorned with fragrant osmanthus and autumn roses, exuded meticulous opulence befitting an event hosted by the Altahart family. On closer inspection, it was dazzlingly luxurious, but the overall picture blended together naturally. Their display of luxury was so elaborate.

 

Many eyes were on the man standing in the center of the ballroom like a painting.

 

When he gave a smooth speech from the podium, there was at least a pretext to openly watch, but now, glances quickly turned away, fearful of being caught. The excitement in their eyes was clear, a pure curiosity towards the exceedingly handsome man.

 

“Well, who do we have here!”

 

Someone approached the man with a champagne glass. In a party like this, the military uniform naturally drew attention.

 

“Our little treasure of Altahart!”

 

Ulrich managed a slight smile, thinking how unbecoming the nickname was for someone of his age.

 

“Colonel Craxson, you made it.”

 

“Haha. These days, seeing your face is as hard as plucking a star from the sky. Only at events like these do I get to see this expensive face.”

 

The world was changing rapidly. At the end, even the once seemingly eternal authority of the nobility was fading like a setting sun.

 

Titles of nobility were no longer prestigious accomplishments. More and more areas were emphasizing visible financial power over such intangible authority.

 

Amidst the increasingly sharp conflict between the monarchy and parliament surrounding the state, the Altahart family maintained close ties with military units capable of mobilizing force, acting as a centrist power.

 

Strength, as unchanging in value as money.

 

Of course, it wasn’t just for political advantage. The more eyes on them, the more restricted their actions. For personal matters requiring manpower, it was much less conspicuous to use the Colonel’s name than that of Altahart. It was a friendship maintained for such purposes.

 

“I’ve been busy with various matters. Just last month, I sent a gift to you through my secretary. I hope you received it safely.”

 

“Oh, of course. I got it, and it was a big hit with my unit.”

 

“It was just a small gift.”

 

“Small gift? Come on, you should know when to be modest.”

 

Colonel Craxson’s eyes, slightly bloodshot from burst capillaries, were a common side effect among drug users. Standing before a soon-to-be addict, Ulrich smiled leisurely.

 

Having tried various substances himself, Ulrich had lost interest as he wasn’t fond of the hazy state induced by drugs. Still, many covertly brought him illicit substances as tribute.

 

He saw great returns from re-gifting these as bribes. What he gave to Colonel Craxson was an aphrodisiac that doubled its effect when taken with alcohol. The Colonel’s vacant eyes indicated he had spent the night indulging in drugs, alcohol, and women.



“By the way, it seems your proud brother is absent today.”

 

Ulrich was still smiling, but his smile had slightly faded.

 

“Oh, you were looking for Gwen, I see. Unfortunately, he has a separate engagement today.”

 

“Is that so? It’s been hard to see Gwen these days. In the past, we would at least bump into each other at the White Club, but even that’s rare now. With both brothers so busy, your family must be thriving. Isn’t that right?”

 

Colonel Craxson laughed heartily and patted Ulrich’s shoulder. Ulrich responded with a pleasant smile. Shortly afterward, hearing someone calling from the other side, Colonel Craxson bid farewell and walked away.

 

“Did you have a good conversation?”

 

Victor, who had been anxious since the Colonel’s arrival, quickly approached and asked.

 

“Listening to a drug addict’s ramblings is pointless.”

 

“Someone might hear you.”

 

“All he does is shoot blindly, he must be out of his mind. Otherwise, he wouldn’t say such nonsense about being proud of Gwen.”

 

No wonder he was so edgy; just as feared, Colonel Craxson had brought up Gwen.

 

“…You held yourself well.”

 

“The guests?”

 

“All those who received invitations have confirmed their attendance.”

 

“Is there anyone left I need to greet personally?”

 

“There is one person… Ah, here she comes.”

 

Ulrich turned towards where Victor was pointing.

 

A woman with elegant brown hair, half pinned with jeweled accessories, wearing an emerald chiffon dress, approached with the sound of clicking heels. Realizing the two knew each other, Victor quietly stepped back.

 

“Ulrich.”

 

Her voice was as graceful as a wild rose.

 

Ulrich lifted the gloved hand of the woman and kissed it. Among the ladies watching, exclamations of “Oh my!” were heard. The beauty of the approaching woman was extraordinary, and the two of them together looked like a piece of art.

 

As he lowered the hand he had been holding, Ulrich began to speak.

 

“I’m pleased you accepted the invitation, Lady Schwaben. Or should I call you Director Schwaben now?”

 

“You can still call me Daphne, as before.”

 

“I can’t do that. You’ve become the owner of the most famous art gallery in Laurent.”

 

“Are you drawing a line?”

 



 

“Don’t do that. I’ve called you Ulrich for a long time.”

 

Her eyes, asking prettily, were as moist as a deer’s. Ulrich looked down at her face, standing straight. Then Daphne took a step closer, clicking her heels.

 

“Is it because there are eyes watching us? Shall we go to a quiet place where no one is around?”

 

Ulrich’s eyebrows twitched slightly. Daphne’s clear and transparent eyes reflected that distinctly. A subtle tension, imperceptible to others, surrounded the two. Soon, Ulrich smiled meaningfully, as if to crush that atmosphere.

 

“A quiet place.”

 



 

“Why does it sound to me like you’re suggesting we do something naughty rather than have a conversation away from prying eyes?”

 

It was an unusually direct statement for the occasion. More surprising was Daphne’s reaction, blushing deeply as if shy. She was an unusual woman, now and then. He couldn’t deny that her unconventionality had once intrigued him.

 

He dismissed the fleeting past with a chuckle.

 

“Well, maybe in the past, but now it doesn’t seem appropriate.”

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“I mean our relationship.”

 

Ulrich leaned toward her slowly.

 

“You’re soon to be my brother’s wife.”

 



 

“Making a sister-in-law a secret mistress is a bit…”

 

Disgusting, isn’t it?

 

His voice was irresistibly seductive, meant only for her ears. As if to emphasize his point, Ulrich’s lips curved beautifully. It was the truth for him, but it was an offensive remark for her, touching on both her promiscuous past and her current respectable life.

 

Unexpectedly, Daphne let out a small laugh.

 

Ulrich maintained a smile, though his eyes showed a slight frown. His feelings mirrored this expression; he was put off by the unclear meaning of her laugh.

 

“It seems… the rumors about you being away from the capital for a while were true.”

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“If not, you would know better than I do.”

 

“I think you’ve had too much to drink.”

 

He smoothly wrapped a retort in polite language, and Daphne laughed, seemingly on purpose. Her inscrutable laughter subtly annoyed him.

 

“Today, I just came to greet you out of joy.”

 



 

“We’ll meet again soon, so let’s talk in detail then, Ulrich.”

 

“Yes, if you have any business, please make an appointment through my secretary.”

 

Even this clear statement that there would be no personal meetings didn’t dampen Daphne’s gentle smile as she left. Ulrich watched her departing figure, then signaled Victor, who was waiting nearby.

 

“I didn’t put that woman on the invitation list. Why is she here?”

 

“Well, actually… Madam Altahart reviewed the list later and added her.”

 

“My mother?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Hmm, Ulrich let out a significant hum.

 

“I can’t figure out the signal. Is it to make sure things are sorted out before my brother’s marriage?”

 

Daphne Schwaben.

 

Currently engaged to Gwen Altahart due to family alliances, she had once shared a bed with Ulrich. It wasn’t a relationship with heartfelt emotions but more of a mutually agreeable physical connection.

 

“If that’s the case, they’re sorely mistaken. It’s been sorted out long ago.”

 

That was the truth. Their time together was in the past. Enough time had passed for Daphne to be regarded as nothing more than a faded memory to Ulrich.

 

She had never held much significance to him anyway, but now, there was absolutely nothing left of their past connection.

 

Daphne had been one of the few who stayed by Ulrich’s side for quite some time among his past lovers. As someone who met him privately, she never overstepped her bounds publicly. She had a passable appearance and could nonchalantly handle his occasional harsh words.

 

Not because she was mature and broad-minded, but because her mind was inherently innocent, he concluded. It became evident while observing her.

 

Such traits didn’t often become a problem but occasionally amused Ulrich. Of course, he soon grew tired and unilaterally cut ties.

 

Afterward, she reappeared a year later as his brother’s fiancée.

 

“Can I leave now? They seem to be having a good time without me.”

 

Having attended the first part, including the owner’s speech, and staying through the second and third parts, considered the after-party, he had fulfilled his duties.

 

Victor nodded, and Ulrich set down the decorative glass he had been holding and sighed. Flashing a mesmerizing smile at anyone who met his eyes, he left the hall naturally.

 

Outside the banquet hall, he loosened the tight tie around his neck. The brooch pinned near the knot was bothersome.

 

He always had to dress meticulously for official events, down to the smallest detail, which was annoying. He never liked ties, but the one Lisbell gave him was nice because it lacked such cumbersome accessories.

 

It was smooth from the knot to the broad end, with nothing catching on his fingers, which he found refreshing. He developed a new habit of repeatedly smoothing it down when deep in thought, often wearing it at the Marnia villa.

 

Also, he found it amusing to see Lisbell shiver quietly whenever she saw it.


“Is that all?”

 

Despite knowing she could never escape, she still approached everything with intensity and desperation, which Ulrich found appealing.

 

To be honest, Ulrich had assumed that on the day Lisbell signed the contract with him, she would break off her engagement.

 

But she didn’t.

 

Until the day her fiancé visited the Marnia estate, Lisbell continued her hopeless relationship. That was her hope, as Ulrich saw in her beautiful face stained with drunken tears.

 

Even though it seemed she had given up, there was a subtle yet persistent desperation that kept her alive. How could that not pique his interest?

 

That’s why she crossed his mind even more in the capital.

 

People born into wealth, like him, who had never experienced true hardship, didn’t understand such intensity and desperation. For them, boasting and showing off was the sole purpose and pleasure in life.

 

Oddly enough, it was hard to feel any elegance from them. They seemed more vulgar and shameless. He was no exception; the entire Altahart family was like that. Their refined exteriors were just a facade, hiding dens of beasts filled with sordid desires.

 

Elegance.

 

Ironically, Ulrich felt it more in Lisbell, who tried her best in life. How could her earnest desire to live to the fullest not be considered noble?

 

Maybe he felt this way because he lacked it himself. She lived her life more meaningfully than he did, who found life so tedious that he wished to die soon.

 

In another sense, he wanted to delve deeper into her.

 

Why did she strive so hard to endure?

 

Everything ends in death anyway.

 

She would become like dust in the wind, ceasing to exist in this world….

 

Life is fleeting, yet Lisbell seemed to hold onto something that made her refuse to give up. This instinctive curiosity welled up within him, making him reflect on the roots of his own life.

 

He wondered what she would do if he severed all those lights she clung to and if he would feel any different from his current pessimistic self if he, too, found such light.

 

In any case, Lisbell was undoubtedly the greatest stimulant in his life right now.

 

He had planned to return to Marnia as soon as his schedule allowed, but the thought of the delicate scent that clung to him made him want to leave immediately. He wished the ground beneath his feet would change from the paved roads of the capital to Marnia’s lush lawns, not the marble reflecting the chandeliers of a luxury hotel.

 

Walking quickly but still composed, he headed for the quiet rear entrance of the hotel.

 



 

He was straightening his loosened tie when he noticed a sedan parked at the wide staircase below. The familiar face of the man standing courteously before the back seat caught his eye. Upon making eye contact, the man bowed respectfully.

 

“Madam Altahart sent me.”

 

It was his mother’s personal secretary.

 

“Oh dear.”

 

Ulrich muttered. It was a sigh of someone facing the inevitable.

 

He had hoped to leave quietly, but that seemed impossible.

 

Indeed, it was a bit surprising.

 

He hadn’t expected that his mother, let alone his brother Gwen, would attend an event that had already been communicated through Victor. It seemed they had retreated for a quiet meeting later.

 

Ignoring it would be an option, but if a summons from the family followed, it would complicate things. With a sigh, Ulrich obediently got into the back seat the secretary had opened for him.

 

The car glided smoothly along the central road.

 

The scenery of the capital hadn’t changed much. The glittering points of light that could hurt the eyes were still the same. Propping his chin, Ulrich surveyed the landscape before succumbing to fatigue and closing his eyes.

 

Soon, the sedan turned into a townhouse complex.

 

Passing by rows of grand houses, the car entered a massive estate even among the exclusive area.

 

Like an enlarged garden in Marnia, the expansive garden encircled a central fountain. The sedan came to a halt before a mansion boasting classic architectural style and vast grounds.

 

“We’ve arrived.”

 

With the driver’s announcement, the door opened.

 

Stepping out, Ulrich straightened his back, noting the staff lined up on either side, bowing deeply.

 

Despite so many visible heads, it was eerily silent, always a curious phenomenon. As Ulrich leisurely surveyed those waiting in hushed anticipation, he noticed the elderly butler approaching.

 

With a seemingly longer mustache, the butler greeted him courteously.

 

“Young Master, it’s been a while. Have you been well?”

 

“Considering I feel nauseous the moment I step in here, I suppose so.”

 

“That’s fortunate to hear. Madam is waiting for you. Please come in.”

 

Ignoring Ulrich’s sarcastic remark, the butler led the way. Unexpectedly interrupted on his way home, Ulrich checked his pocket watch. Leaving the reception early had given him some extra time.

 

Yet, in this house, you never knew when or where variables would arise. The topic his mother summoned him for would determine the extent of those variables.

 

“Oh my.”

 

As Ulrich entered the living room, a fond sigh greeted him.

 

He looked up to see his mother sitting regally on a single-seat sofa. A red-haired handsome man stood behind her. He was new.

 

“So, my hard-to-see son has finally arrived.”

 

“Glad to confirm I’m alive.”

 

Responding indifferently, Ulrich took a seat on the prepared sofa.

 

As he crossed his legs, a servant approached and listed the available beverages. Ulrich asked for a glass of iced soda. He was in a hurry, so he declined hot tea or coffee.

 

“Really, it’s heartbreaking…. How could you leave without a word? If Victor hadn’t been passing messages, I wouldn’t have known what to do.”

 

Acting as if deeply wounded by her son’s indifferent attitude, Lady Altahart clutched her chest. Ulrich chuckled at the sight.

 

“Your acting has improved.”

 

He leisurely added after quenching his thirst with the quickly served soda.

 

“What play inspired you this time?”

 

Both Ulrich and his brother Gwen knew well—his mother was the most eccentric person in this household.

 

She had a knack for changing faces, not in the surgical sense but in personality, as if another soul temporarily possessed her.

 

She had always loved theater, finding immense joy in observing others’ lives. “Tragedy up close, comedy from afar,” was a phrase she lived by.

 

Her husband’s death had let her whims bloom fully.



The beginning of it all was when the most popular male actor of the theater troupe came to the Altahart estate. At the time, I thought it was just because his charming appearance had caught her eye and she wanted to have some fun for a night.

 

But that wasn’t all.

 

The lady would take them as her lovers and then act as if she were the heroine of the play they starred in. She would fit herself into the role of their partner, living life as if she were that character. It was the essence of vicarious experience.

 

Those related to her realized this when the first male actor was quietly dismissed from his position as her lover, and a second actor was chosen to replace him.

 

When she was with them, her personality subtly changed. Since the heroines in the plays these actors starred in were different, she changed her face accordingly.

 

It was a bizarre act, but with enough money, nothing was impossible. And the lady had more than enough money to keep her secret dream alive.

 

Actors who caught her eye and served her received enormous sponsorship on a monthly basis. Furthermore, just the name Altahart was a powerful enough backing to ensure they wouldn’t be easily dismissed from leading roles. Their treatment within the troupe improved to almost that of the troupe leader.

 

Also, the lady had been a celebrated beauty in society. For a stunning woman like her, just a bit of flattery would make the money flow. It was a position many would volunteer for without hesitation.

 

To Ulrich, it seemed that his mother was currently absorbed in her own performance. The exaggerated act of dabbing at nonexistent tears with her long sleeves was an indication of that.

 

The “current” lover, standing by her side, comforted her, his touch subtly suggestive, befitting his role as a physical consort.

 

“So, what do you want from me?”

 

“Have you eaten?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“That’s a pity. I thought we could have a nice meal together after a long time.”

 

“Do that with my brother.”

 

“That’s difficult, which is why I’m asking you.”

 

Ulrich paused his idle sipping of sparkling water.

 

“What do you mean, difficult?”

 

“Gwen has collapsed.”

 

This was unexpected news.

 

Ulrich set down the glass he had been twirling.

 

“Suddenly?”

 

“Yes, it was a sudden blow.”

 

“Is there a problem?”

 

The lady sighed.

 

Her expression darkened slightly, revealing glimpses of her unmasked face.

 

“Syphilis, they say.”

 

“Syphilis?”

 

Ulrich let out a small laugh.

 

“That’s a sexually transmitted disease, isn’t it?”

 

Given Gwen’s promiscuous nature, it wasn’t entirely surprising.

 

“How is he?”

 

“Not good.”

 

“How bad?”

 

“Very.”

 

“Is he close to death?”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“Judging by your reluctance to answer, I guess he is.”

 

The lady confirmed with silence.

 

Ulrich, resting his chin on his hand, turned to look out the window.

 

Gwen’s death, huh.

 

It was he who always spoke of suicide, but now it was his brother whose life was in danger. Life was truly unpredictable. Has Gwen written a proper will? If not, perhaps he should subtly intervene now. As he pondered this, his mother spoke again.

 

“So, Ulrich.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“You need to get married.”

 

Ulrich couldn’t believe his ears. The sudden shift in topic left him momentarily stunned.

 

“You know that Gwen is engaged to the young lady of the Schwaben family.”

 

“…”

 

“I’ve only informed them of Gwen’s condition, but the Schwaben Marquis seems uneasy. There are reports that he’s been attending social gatherings he rarely went to since the engagement. We need to present an alternative before he gets any strange ideas.”

 

“Is that alternative me?”

 

“Your marriage was bound to proceed once Gwen got married.”

 

“…”

 

“With Gwen in this state, you, as the second son, must take over his succession duties. Handling your marriage simultaneously isn’t a bad idea.”

 

“Do you desire the Schwaben family’s gemstone mines that much?”

 

“I can’t deny it. The assessment my appraiser finally completed indicates that the undeveloped mines will bring in a fortune. It would be foolish to miss out on such wealth.”

 

“…”

 

“And the Altahart family cannot afford to be foolish. You understand that, don’t you?”

 

Her assertion, reminding him of the scrutiny on their family, was sharp. Feeling a sudden tension in his neck, Ulrich rubbed it and glanced at the ambiguous corner between the ceiling and the wall.

 

“We’ll meet again soon to discuss the details, Ulrich.”

 

Now, he understood what Daphne meant at the hotel reception party.

 

“So, that’s why…”

 

Thinking of her made his head throb more. His past interest in her had faded, leaving only a weary residue.

 

Still, her carefree simplicity, which he had once found endearing, would now become an irritating thorn. Just anticipating the effort of dealing with her was exhausting, indicating that he had no affection left for her.

 

Yes, it was really bothersome.

 

There was someone else Ulrich wanted to observe 24/7, tied up right in front of him. So why this talk of Schwaben?

 

His lips curled with a crooked smile.

 

“What a shame. I’m already married.”

 

“…What?”

 

“And I have children.”

 

“This is nonsense.”

 

“I have three.”

 

“…Ulrich. What are you talking about?”

 

His mother’s stunned expression quickly regained composure.

 

“You’ve been in Marnia for less than a year. How could you have three children in that time?”

 

She saw through his nonsensical statements as a desperate attempt to avoid the arranged marriage.

 

“That’s a bias, Mother. They could be triplets.”

 

“If nothing else, I know my beloved son is speaking nonsense.”

 

“…”

 

“Now, stop this protest and come back to the capital.”

 

“To prepare for a marriage, right?”

 

“That’s not all. As I said, you need to take over the succession duties Gwen was supposed to handle, and time is running out.”

 

“…”

 

“You went to Marnia because Gwen refused to hand over the department store management rights. That problem is essentially resolved now, so I don’t see why you need to stay there.”

 

Her gaze was sharp like a well-honed blade. Despite appearing as a whimsical lady lost in her role-playing, she was undoubtedly the head of the Altahart family.

 

They didn’t hesitate to suppress emotions for the sake of the family and wealth. While the sadness over Gwen’s critical condition was not insignificant, maintaining the family’s position was more important. They prioritized ensuring that the family machinery continued to run smoothly over the death of a member.

 

Her stern and dry demeanor in using Gwen’s condition to bring Ulrich back to the capital was a testament to this duty.

 

It might seem cold, but that was how the Altahart family had amassed and maintained their wealth for generations.

 

They took what they wanted with relentless determination and discarded what they didn’t need without hesitation.

 

Ulrich, listening to his mother’s complaints, excused himself, using the bathroom as an excuse. Victor was waiting outside. As he walked past, Victor quickly followed.

 

“Should I have the car ready?”

 

“Before that, I should see my dying brother’s face.”

 

Ulrich’s calm tone made Victor look ashamed.

 

“I apologize for not informing you earlier.”

 

“When did you find out?”

 

“Just last week. The lady was very secretive about this.”

 

“Understandably so.”

 

Ulrich didn’t question further and walked quietly.

 

Navigating the long and complicated corridors without getting lost, he eventually stopped in front of a bedroom.



Knock Knock

 

When he knocked, a businesslike voice from inside asked for his identity. Instead of answering, he flung the door open. His mother’s trusted aide looked startled by the rude intrusion but quickly stepped back when he recognized it was Ulrich.

 

With the obstacle gone, Ulrich walked inside.

 



 

Reaching the bed, he crossed his arms and looked down at it askew.

 

On the bed, bathed in the soft afternoon sunlight, lay Gwen, who was said to be at death’s door. Just as the report had said, his once sturdy frame was severely deteriorated. He seemed to have lost a lot of weight, and his complexion was so pale it was unbearable to look at. It was as if he was showing the slow process of how a human being approaches death.

 

“Syphilis, huh?”

 

Of all the diseases, it had to be that one. It was a headache-inducing revelation. Unless even the god he worshipped was fed up with his merry romps and there was no other explanation for such bad luck, it was almost comically fitting for him.

 

In a way, it was a very appropriate end for him.

 

What goes around comes around, after all.

 

All he’d ever done in life was gamble away all his money at the White Club, where he had people preemptively bribe others to rig games, or take various drugs while indulging with prostitutes in his bedroom. Therefore, it was only fitting that his downfall would be so disgraceful.

 

“I wonder if, next time I see you, you’ll be lying in a coffin instead of a bed.”

 



 

“Before that, I must make sure to get your signed resignation from managing the department store.”

 

In their family, the mention of money could wake anyone from their sleep. It wouldn’t be a bad idea to secure everything firmly in case he miraculously returned from the grave. It was a pragmatic conversation to have in front of a dying brother, but there was no other choice. After all, Ulrich himself was also an Altahart.

 

He leaned forward. A long shadow cast over Gwen’s body lying under the blanket.

 

“It might have been your last wish, but you certainly managed to hold me back.”

 



 

“I hadn’t planned to come back to the capital just yet….”

 

Ulrich muttered ominously to his unconscious brother and then sensed someone’s presence, turning his head.

 

The door connecting to a small room inside the bedroom was open. A child was standing behind the door, peeking in.

 

Ulrich immediately recognized the child as his brother’s illegitimate son.

 

As their eyes met, the child’s shoulders shot up in surprise. He was so startled that they didn’t settle back down for a long while.

 

Ulrich straightened up from leaning over Gwen. The shadow that had stretched menacingly over his brother also retreated.

 

The child pursed his lips as if he might burst into tears. Sensing the child’s anxiety, Ulrich uncrossed his arms and walked towards the door.

 

He stopped just a step away from the child and bent his knees to meet the child’s eye level.

 

“Honestly.”

 

Ulrich slowly extended his hand.

 

He gently patted the platinum-blond hair that was so similar to his own and Gwen’s. The child flinched at the sudden touch but gradually relaxed, feeling no threat in the hand’s movement.

 

“You really make things difficult for everyone….”

 

The child’s innocent eyes darted around, unable to find focus. Watching the child’s genuine confusion, Ulrich murmured quietly,

 

“Irresponsible Gwen Altahart.”

 

After patting the child’s head a few more times, Ulrich left the bedroom.

 

Victor, waiting outside, informed him that the car was ready. Ulrich headed straight for the exit. He briefly told a servant following him that he had urgent business and then got into the car, taking out his pocket watch.

 

Even if they drove nonstop from now on, they would only reach Marnia after dark.

 

His fingers tapped the side of the pocket watch as if measuring something. It was a close call. Somehow, the inside of his heart thumped. It had been a while since he felt this kind of thrill.

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes, sir.”

 

“Find out if there are any long-term hospital rooms available at the Royal Capital Hospital.”

 

“Hospital rooms, sir?”

 

“Yes,” Ulrich replied, turning his gaze out the window.

 

As he looked at his brother lying there, rotting like a corpse, what surprisingly came to his mind was a complete stranger. It was the villa in Marnia where he had spent a few months; someone else was bedridden there in a similar condition to his brother.

 

And he kept thinking of the small nape of someone who stayed by that bed no matter the rain or snow. The nape with hair that used to be well-groomed but now often left unkempt as if they had given up on caring for themselves.

 

“Have you… ever loved anyone?”

 

The violet eyes that looked at him.

 

Ulrich quietly smiled, gazing indifferently out the window.

 

Love.

 

He occasionally saw people in love.

 

Sometimes he heard about it through rumors, and sometimes he witnessed it with his own eyes.

 

Despite their different forms and stories, they all had one fatal commonality.

 

They were all out of their minds.

 

People in love often did crazy things.

 

It was as if that absurdly childish and crude emotion grabbed the person’s brain and shook it wildly.

 

Ulrich hated such things.

 

It was nothing but disgraceful and pathetic.

 

Whenever he saw those who voluntarily jumped into the fire under the guise of such illogical emotions, all he felt was cold contempt that made his entire body freeze.

 

Naturally, acceptance and understanding were out of the question.

 

Above all, that emotion was too fragile.

 

For an Altahart, who had to deal with people all their life, it was an unnecessary attitude and condition. Being in love meant having a weakness. Letting someone else hold your heart was an incredibly dangerous thing.

 

You didn’t have to look far.

 

Just look at Lisbell Osborne.

 

Because she loved her mother and her fiancé, she was constantly pushed around. Her pitiful and wretched state was the result of her love, which she talked about so much.

 

Ulrich had no desire to end up like that.

 

That’s why he openly laughed at Lisbell’s assertion that he had never been in love. There was nothing to offer but a contemptuous smirk to someone who bragged about something he never even wanted.

 

The car’s engine purred softly.

 

Imagining the situation waiting for him in Marnia, Ulrich leaned back comfortably in his seat.



Swish.

 

Lisbell’s gaze, which was fixed on her book, lifted.

 

Perhaps it was just a momentary whim of the weather, but a heavy rain, which hadn’t been predicted earlier, was now pouring down outside the window.

 

She tried to read her book again but soon gave up.

 

The sound of rain invading the bedroom was louder than expected, swallowing up her tiny voice. She could speak a little louder, but at the moment, she didn’t feel the energy for it.

 

She just accepted it.

 

Though she knew getting used to giving up wasn’t beneficial, she was too tired to fight every little thing.

 

It had been like this since Theodore had visited. The small hope she had held onto like grains of sand slipped through her fingers, and she had no will left to grab onto anything again.

 

Since that day, Lisbell had picked up the telephone several times only to put it back down. She kept hesitating, torn between telling Theodore the truth now or fearing it was too late.

 

If she had meant to hold on, she should have followed him that day. Since giving up at that moment, the relationship had irreparably fractured.

 

Even though she desperately wanted to fix it, her current situation made it impossible. It would only lead to the same cruel repetition.

 

So Lisbell let Theodore go little by little.

 

Even if he left, she still had someone left.

 

“Mother.”

 

Lisbell, putting her book down, grasped her mother’s dry hand on the blanket. It still lacked any warmth. As she massaged her mother’s hand, hoping for better blood circulation, her eyes darkened. She thought of the man who had saved her mother’s life but had, in return, thrown her into the mud.


He wasn’t at the villa at the moment. Two days ago, he had to leave for an appointment in the capital. He said it would take about three days, so he would return to Marnia either today or tomorrow.

 

That fact occasionally returned as a bitter reality.

 

The reason was her own appearance, still staying in a corner of this villa even though he was not here.

 

There was nothing physically holding her, but Lisbell was trapped in this villa. An inescapable reality tied her tightly to this place, which felt like a prison.

 

Still, until recently, she seemed to have held onto some faint hope, but now she wasn’t sure.

 

Would the day come when her mother would regain consciousness and open her eyes?

 

Was she clinging to a hope that was too much like ashes?

 

She couldn’t even hold it tight because she was scared, but even if she did, it would eventually shatter. Was she holding onto such a fragile hope?

 



 

It was then.

 

Lisbell’s eyelashes fluttered.

 

“…Mother?”

 

She felt a faint movement in her mother’s fingers, which she had been holding and rubbing for a long time.

 

Was it an illusion?

 

Was it really an illusion?

 

Forgetting even the worn-out hope she had been chewing over, Lisbell stood up suddenly.

 

“Mother… Mother!”

 

Her voice, already delicate and now cracked like parched land from not speaking to anyone for nearly two days since Ulrich left, desperately called out. Responding to her call, her mother’s fingers twitched once more.

 

Lisbell hurriedly looked at her mother’s face. As if nerves that had been asleep for a long time were waking up one by one, strength entered here and there. Soon, her mother’s eyelids gradually lifted. Lisbell, seeing the purple eyes she hadn’t seen since they returned to Marnia, felt a surge of emotion.

 

“Mother, are you coming to your senses?”

 

Having been unconscious for quite a while, her mother couldn’t come to her senses right away. After a long period of numbness, her eyes, which barely regained focus, looked at her daughter who was holding her hand desperately.

 

She opened her dry lips. No sound came out. Perhaps because her vocal cords were strained from not being used for so long, only a dry, raspy sound escaped.

 

“Wait, just a moment. I’ll get you some water.”

 

Lisbell propped her up and quickly grabbed a water glass. After filling it up, she brought it to her mother’s lips and tilted it. Her mother couldn’t swallow well even then. As she coughed, Lisbell wiped the wet corners of her mouth with a handkerchief.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

The name her mother managed to call out, after barely stopping her cough, reached her ears.

 

Ah, why does it feel so dreamlike to hear this voice calling me? Lisbell’s eyes filled with tears, unsure whether from longing or relief. As she quietly wiped them away, Mrs. Osborne’s eyes, seemingly becoming clearer in consciousness, looked around.

 

“Where…?”

 

“This is Marnia Villa. The place where you used to work, Mother.”

 

“What on earth… happened?”

 

“Don’t you remember? Mother, you collapsed.”

 

“What?”

 

“Why didn’t you tell me?”

 



 

“Why didn’t you say a word about being unwell…?”

 

Why didn’t you say anything…?

 

Her voice, choked with sobs, was cut off.

 

Mrs. Osborne, sensing how the secret she had desperately wanted to hide had been revealed, let out a small sigh.

 

“It seems I’ve caused you worry.”

 

“They said you collapsed while working. Your condition was so bad that you went straight into surgery.”

 

“Surgery…? I had surgery? Then, how did we manage the cost?”

 

Lisbell smiled bitterly at her mother, who couldn’t help but bring up money even in this situation.

 

“…Mr. Altahart helped us.”

 

“The master did?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“So… that’s why I’m here?”

 

Her mother seemed clueless about everything. It was natural. Although many things had happened to Lisbell, it was all during the time her mother was unconscious. In a way, the foundation of this situation was laid before she collapsed, but Lisbell had kept it a secret, so there was no blame to place on her mother.

 

“The master is….”

 

“He’s not here right now.”

 

“Not here?”

 

“He went to the capital.”

 

“…What is going on…? Anyway, it seems the master took care of me. Did he contact you to come here? And you’ve been by my side since then? What’s the date today? How long have I been unconscious?”

 

Lisbell, calmly tidying up her mother’s wrinkled blanket, spoke.

 

“Summer has just passed.”

 



 

“Autumn will be here soon.”

 

Her mother’s fussy actions suddenly stopped. The mention of the change in seasons carried a clear implication.

 

The one who knew better than anyone that her daughter would be a bride in late summer was Mrs. Osborne. She also knew that her daughter was supposed to leave for another country after the wedding.

 

It was something that should have happened before the end of summer. So the fact that her daughter was still here could only mean one thing.

 

“Lisbell, you…”

 

“I’m breaking off my engagement with Theo.”

 

“…Is it because of me?”

 

“It’s not like that.”

 

Lisbell reached out to calm her mother, who was already sinking into grief. Pulling up the blanket that had slipped down her body, she whispered softly.

 

“It was my decision.”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

“So you don’t need to worry, Mother.”

 



 

“Please lie down, Mother. You just woke up, and if you strain yourself like this….”

 

“Lisbell!”

 

As Lisbell was about to turn away to contact the doctor staying in the annex, her wrist was grabbed.

 

The strength was quite strong for someone who had just woken up. It showed how desperate her mother was.

 

“Tell me honestly. Have I become a burden to you…?”

 

Looking down at her mother’s emaciated hand, Lisbell gently placed it back and covered it with her palm.

 

“It’s okay, Mother.”

 



 

“Really, it’s all okay.”

 

Her voice was hollow. It felt that way because she tried to keep as much emotion out of it as possible.

 

But this was the best. Her mother had been unconscious for a long time and had just opened her eyes. Even though she had recovered enough to communicate after the long rest, she still needed to be careful. And the truths she had to reveal would undoubtedly be too much for her mother.

 

“Sleep a little more, Mother.”

 

Hold on.

 

It’s not the right time yet.

 

So hold on, endure, and persevere, and then, when everything seems back to normal….

 

Lisbell’s hand, pulling up the blanket, hesitated. A sense of despair briefly crossed her mind, wondering if such a day would ever come for her. Mrs. Osborne, who had been silently watching her daughter, caught her hesitation.

 

“The air is a bit chilly. If you feel cold, use this blanket….”

 

“Why….”

 



 

“Why are you so… thin?”

 

Mrs. Osborne’s small question froze Lisbell.

 

“Lisbell, was your wrist always this thin…?”

 

That one sentence was the problem.

 

All the fabricated sentences, busy trying to fill everything with lies, evaporated from her mind. At that moment, hearing those words, she felt as if she was hitting an insurmountable wall. Along with occasional feelings of injustice and futility.

 

Why did she have to swallow everything?

 

If she hid it from Theodore and even from her mother, whom could she confide in about this endlessly turbulent turmoil inside her?

 

Drip Drip

 

Tears suddenly poured out. Lisbell quickly covered her mouth with her hand. She knew she had to stop, but it wasn’t working. Rubbing her tear-filled eyes, she spoke incoherently.

 

“No, this is, this is just….”

 

“Lisbell.”

 

Her mother’s voice, unlike her own tearful one, was firm. She looked up with deeply trembling eyes. Mrs. Osborne, having sensed the discord, silently held Lisbell’s wrist tightly.

 

The strength was stronger than Lisbell had vaguely imagined. It felt like a signal that she wouldn’t collapse even after hearing her confession. Even knowing it was just a fragile mind wanting to depend, Lisbell, as if mesmerized, opened her mouth. It was right to say she couldn’t hold out any longer.

 

“The truth is, actually….

 

Tears rolled down her cheeks and fell onto the bedding covering her mother.

 

She didn’t even know what she was saying. Relying on the hot tears, she poured out the things she hadn’t been able to tell anyone, incoherently.

 

With her head bowed low, she couldn’t see her mother’s expression. She couldn’t bear to look. Even knowing that her mother’s face would be as contorted as her own, she knew it was irrevocable. It wasn’t possible, and she realized she didn’t have enough energy left inside.

 

It was at that point.

 

Without even realizing it, she had collapsed to such a point.

 

After a heavy confession, only the cold air remained in the bedroom. She could easily picture her mother, completely pale from head to toe, after learning the truth. As regret, spreading like a bruise from inside, took over.

 

“Why….”

 

A faint but undeniable warmth touched her cheek. Lisbell flinched and looked up. Her vision, blurred with tears, was cloudy.

 

So she couldn’t see her mother’s expression, but she could sense it.

 

“Why didn’t you say anything?”

 



 

“Why didn’t you tell me….”

 

She finally understood.

 

Her mother’s stubborn refusal to mention her own condition was no different from her own determination to hide every setback she faced.

 

No, it was a mirror image of her own actions.

* * *
Lean and frail, Lisbell leaned on those diligent hands trying to wipe away her tears and completed her confession. Her mother, unable to hide her shock, occasionally stiffened her expression and soon after, tears welled up in her own eyes.

 

“Oh my god, the master…”

 

Unable to continue, the lady clutched her chest with a clenched fist, unable to bear it. Lisbell, unable to wipe away her own tears, tried to calm her mother, fearing that even such actions might strain her.

 

“I should have been honest from the start. If I had, things wouldn’t have gotten this bad…”

 

“Lisbell, you don’t need to eat yourself up over it.”

 

“…”

 

“I think I understand how we both feel now…”

 

Lisbell’s heart ached. She bit her lip, then nodded carefully.

 

Mrs. Osborne, who was gently stroking her daughter’s pale cheek, looked out the window. Watching the now lighter rain, she suddenly spoke.

 

“Let’s leave together.”

 

“…What?”

 

“I can’t leave you in this place any longer.”

 

“…”

 

“Before the master returns… we should quickly gather our things and leave.”

 

Lisbell was taken aback.

 

“But, but mother. I have a contract with him. And mother, you just woke up. Your condition…”

 

“Don’t worry about me. It’s not as bad as you think.”

 

To prove her point, her mother swung her legs out of bed. Lisbell quickly moved to support her. With her help, her mother stood up slowly and took a few steps around the bed.

 

“You said the problem was my surgery and hospital bills. If we break the contract, we’ll just have to repay that money. We’ll leave this place together… and pay it off gradually. That’s what we’ll do. No matter how long it takes, as long as we can repay it, there’s no reason for you to be treated this way.”

 

Lisbell was momentarily stunned. It was something she couldn’t handle alone, something that had always brought her to her knees. Her mother was discussing it so easily.

 

It’s not something that can be handled so easily.

 

Doubt grew from the adversities Lisbell had to face here.

 

But only for a moment.

 

Before her mother regained consciousness, there were many things that gave her psychological pressure. The overwhelming costs and the confession she couldn’t bring herself to make to Theodore.

 

But now her mother had opened her eyes, and now that she had given up her future with Theodore, there was no reason to be held back by that fact.

 

In other words, I am free…

 

“Is it really… okay?”

 

“…”

 

“Can I, can I leave this place?”

 

A fine ray of light seeped into Lisbell’s cloudy eyes. Mrs. Osborne gently stroked her daughter’s hair and said.

 

“Of course.”

 

“…”

 

“You, Lisbell, you don’t have to be tied to anyone like this. Especially not because of me.”

 

The hope that seemed impossible alone was now overflowing just because her mother had opened her eyes.

 

Having made a decision, her heart grew impatient. Although she had regained consciousness, her mother was still an invalid with limited mobility. To head to the train station with her, they had to hurry.

 

Though unspoken, mother and daughter shared the same thought: this had to be done before Ulrich returned to Marnia.

 

Even if Ulrich escalated the issue to a lawsuit, as long as their intent to repay was communicated, they would manage. First, they had to escape from this place filled with bad memories and psychological pressure to see any sign of a new beginning. Her mother surely thought the same.

 

Lisbell went to her room and opened her suitcase. She packed a few pieces of clothing and some travel money, then grabbed an umbrella from the wardrobe.

 

Fortunately, the rain was light.

 

“Mother, hold onto my arm tightly. If it feels too rushed, let me know immediately.”

 

Lisbell wrapped a cape around her mother’s shoulders to protect her from the cold weather and stepped out.

 

The gate was open, probably for Ulrich’s return today or tomorrow. Lisbell, tightly supporting her mother to prevent her from falling, passed through the gate.

 

It was unbelievable. She never imagined she would leave the villa with her mother so safely.

 

Then, Mrs. Osborne coughed.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

“Don’t worry about me. Let’s go.”

 

Reading Lisbell’s worried gaze, Mrs. Osborne smiled. Even that pale smile was worrisome. They needed to reach the train station quickly to let her rest.

 

Leaving the iron gate, they soon entered a narrow path. Due to the heavy rain, the ground was muddy. Supporting her coughing mother, Lisbell walked along the path heavily scented with rain.

 

After the narrow path, a vast meadow stretched out, with a winding road running through it.

 

On days without rain, she occasionally saw carriages passing by. She hoped they could catch one.

 

As she heard the leaves shuddering from the raindrops, the narrow path came to an end. Lisbell tilted her umbrella back to survey the surroundings.

 

As her view cleared, the weight of her mother leaning on one arm suddenly increased. Lisbell dropped the umbrella and hurriedly caught her mother.

 

“Mother? Mother!”

 

Mrs. Osborne’s complexion was as pale as a sheet, much worse than before. She trembled all over and then coughed with her last strength.

 

Blood spread around her lips. It was hemoptysis. Horrified, Lisbell hurriedly propped her against a tree trunk.

 

“Mother, what’s wrong…! Mother!”

 

The rain pounded painfully in her ears.

 

Lisbell didn’t think of retrieving the fallen umbrella but frantically checked her mother.

 

But the situation didn’t improve.

 

In fact, it only got worse. Her mother, who had been coughing, was now pale and still, her eyes gently closed.

 

Lisbell knew that face well.

 

The face she had seen almost daily in the cozy bedroom of the villa.

 

The face of her mother who hadn’t regained consciousness after surgery.

 

That face now loomed over her mother like a demon. With trembling hands, Lisbell cupped her mother’s cheeks.

 

Mother, mother.

 

Her faint breaths shattered against the falling raindrops.

 

Mother, mother, mother…

 

Lisbell kept calling. Standing before the vast meadow, she felt trapped in a small box, overwhelmed by a sense of claustrophobia. As the waves of anxiety rose, she let her tears flow, lowering her trembling hands.

 

Slowly, she leaned in.

 

She pressed her ear to her mother’s chest, wrapped in the cape.

 

Thump, thump, thump.

 

It was beating.

 

But.

 

Thump… thump… thump…

 

It was slow. It was slowing down. Her mother’s heartbeat was gradually slowing.

 

Was the anxiety chilling her fingertips creating an illusion?

 

She wished it were so, but it seemed highly unlikely. Her mother had stopped coughing altogether.

 

“No, no…”

 

Please, please.

 

Even as she chanted, the beating in her ears grew fainter. Like a dying flame, it seemed inevitable that it would finally go out.

 

Lisbell turned her head blankly in the midst of the relentless downpour.

 

Toward the villa.

 

There was a doctor there. If she carried her mother and ran now, sprinted with all her might, she might save her.

 

But… she couldn’t bring herself to act.

 

Go back?

 

Again?

 

To that villa?

 

No.

 

How could she go back after finally escaping?

 

I don’t want to.

 

What determination had it taken to leave?

 

Never…

 

I don’t want to go back.

 

To that place that sucked the meaning out of everyday life, never…

 

“Ugh…”

 

She felt nauseous. The situation that kept forcing her into such lowly choices made her shudder with all her heart.

 

Even now, with her mother’s heartbeat slowing to a stop in front of her, Lisbell clutched her head. A soundless scream burst from her open lips. It felt like the scene in the drawing room was repeating itself. As if she were trapped in a very bad, helpless prank.

 

The rain poured heavily.

 

Earlier, it seemed bearable, but now it felt like a torrential downpour, crushing her body unbearably. The rain-soaked her hair and seemed to penetrate her brain. Her body grew heavy and wet. The temperature of the rain was as cold as ice. Her body, drenched in it, cooled down.

 

And so did her heart.

 

“…Mother.”

 

No response.

 

“Mother.”

 

No matching gaze.

 

“Mother…”

 

In front of this despicable display, her vile nature.

 

If I give you up, I don’t have to return to that hell, do I…


Tok.

 

A raindrop, precariously hanging on the edge of a leaf, fell onto Lisbell’s head.

 

“…!”

 

At that moment, she experienced a feeling of her heart plummeting to the ground.

 

Startled, she fell backward, landing on her backside. Without even thinking of adjusting her clothes soaked in the muddy puddle, she covered her mouth with her hand.

 

Feeling as if she were seeing a detached soul, an eerie and shivering sensation washed over her, and Lisbell was seized by the impulse to peel off her own skin. A wave of guilt washed over her, gnawing at her like bitter bile.

 

How could this happen?

 

No matter how the situation turned out, how could she even think of abandoning her mother…

 

She felt like a horrible monster.

 

Facing the freedom she wanted to reclaim, she was about to abandon her only blood relative. In other words, she was choosing a cowardly escape over the evident way to save her mother, overwhelmed by extreme selfishness. Even amidst this, she despised herself for only wanting not to return to that villa.

 

Unable to move forward or backward, Lisbell collapsed weakly. In the rain that seemed to wash away her senses and melt her very existence, she was sinking deeper, almost to the point of being buried under the ground.

 

A round violet light gathered above the trees.

 

Through the pouring rain, a car quietly appeared.

 

The source of the violet light near the tree her mother was leaning against was the car’s headlights. The engine sound pierced through the noise of the rainwater and settled.

 

The car stopped in front of the path, and the back door opened.

 

A black umbrella popped up. Unlike herself, who was struggling even to avoid a single drop of rain, the man who got out of the car, Ulrich, had returned to the villa before she could escape and was calmly standing there, avoiding the rain.

 

What she couldn’t even dream of avoiding was something he could handle with a mere gesture.

 

A new awareness struck her as a fresh despair.

 

“….”

 

“….”

 

The cold sound of rain was slicing through her ears. The continuous noise felt like his sneering, poking at her nerves.

 

Her body shivered uncontrollably. He was always an enigma, but he had never instilled such intense fear in her as he did today. The moment she recognized him, Lisbell’s lips parted.

 

“I’m… sorry.”

 

“….”

 

“I’m sorry, I…”

 

Ulrich, who hadn’t spoken a word since getting out of the car, raised an eyebrow. Soon, he took a leisurely step forward.

 

Even the splashing sound was elegant. No matter how much rain poured down, it couldn’t leave a mark on him. The man, who seemed invincible, bent down in front of the sunken Lisbell.

 

The black umbrella tilted slightly.

 

“What is it?”

 

For a moment, she thought the rain had stopped. And it had, indeed, stopped.

 

Thanks to Ulrich tilting the umbrella towards her.

 

“Speak.”

 

“….”

 

“What are you sorry for?”

 

It seemed lenient, but it wasn’t. His soft voice was laden with reproach.

 

What was she doing here?

 

Was she trying to run away?

 

Did she dare to do such a thing?

 

In his brief questions, sharp implications floated.

 

Lisbell lowered her head. Her face was drenched, and she couldn’t tell if it was from tears or rain. Ulrich watched her silently before glancing away.

 

“Is this the time to keep your mouth shut?”

 

“….”

 

“Your mother doesn’t seem to have much time.”

 

Her body flinched as if pricked by needles.

 

Her terrified eyes turned towards her mother, leaning against the tree.

 

She looked like a corpse, unmistakably so to any passerby. The feeling of her heart being twisted and plummeting to the ground from earlier came back vividly.

 

It was the worst. Lisbell bit her lip.

 

“Please, save her.”

 

“….”

 

“I’m sorry. It’s all my fault…”

 

“….”

 

“So please, save my mother, please…”

 

She couldn’t even lift her face as she pleaded desperately. Now she could distinguish between tears and rain. The tears, seeping from her scraped insides, were hot enough to burn.

 

She couldn’t deny that it was a very faint thread of relief.

 

What kind of relief, though, she didn’t know. She couldn’t understand.

 

Perhaps it was simply the relief of being able to save her mother. Or perhaps, deeper down, it was a vile pardon for the humanity she momentarily lost.

 

A large palm cupped the back of her head.

 

Lisbell was drawn into his arms without any resistance. Even though she could escape the rain and be embraced, she felt nothing but an ominous foreboding.

 

“Lisbell, having too many thoughts when you’re naive leads to this.”

 

“….”

 

“You always make the situation worse.”

 

Lisbell’s eyelids quivered. It was a weak movement, like the last struggle of a butterfly caught in a spider’s web. No matter how she struggled, she couldn’t escape.

 

At some point, the invisible trap started layering itself around her, without her even knowing.

 

“In such cases, not thinking at all is also a way.”

 

Grip.

 

She felt the force gripping her hair. The gesture, now revealing its claws, carried a refined warning.

 

“Don’t do anything foolish.”

 

“….”

 

“Just stay still…”

 

No matter how much she struggled, she didn’t feel her feet properly land anywhere.

 

Just swaying this way and that. Her senses were completely disarrayed, similar to a feeling of floating.

 

Only then did she realize.

 

What she had been doing all along.

 

Oh, I am… falling.

 

***

 

A needle was inserted into her thin arm.

 

While watching the liquid being injected, Ulrich glanced at the contract in his hand.

 

“Young master, it is done.”

 

The doctor attending to Mrs. Osborne adjusted his glasses and reported. Only then did Ulrich turn his head straight.

 

“Is she safe?”

 

“Yes. Her body temperature dropped considerably, but it wasn’t for a long time, so she’ll recover with sufficient rest.”

 

“No side effects or anything?”

 

“No. It wasn’t a treatment likely to cause side effects in the first place… You had asked to adjust the medication so she could wake up for an hour or two on the day you returned from the capital. It’s like she woke up from a long sleep briefly and then fell asleep again.”

 

“Good job. There are doctors in Laurent who have difficulty even with that, but you seem to manage well.”

 

When Ulrich finished speaking, Victor, who had been standing by, took out a notebook and wrote something. The doctor, recognizing it as a check issued only by the Altahart family bank, swallowed hard. It was an item valuable enough just to possess, with gold edges.

 

“You flatter me. Shall we proceed with the same treatment as before starting tomorrow?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“To keep her in a state of continuous sleep.”

 

At the confirming tone, Ulrich just nodded slightly. Meanwhile, Victor handed the doctor a check with the pre-determined amount. The doctor accepted it with great gratitude.

 

“A capable doctor like you should have been by my brother’s side.”

 

“Haha, it wasn’t such a difficult request. If you ever need my services again, please feel free to call me anytime.”

 

It seemed the doctor thought it was just flattery. Though sincere, Ulrich didn’t want to emphasize it too much, so he just gave a suitable smile. After his duty, the doctor left the bedroom.

 

Ulrich walked quietly to the bed. Lying on it was a woman with a complexion that seemed fragile enough to shatter.

 

Just as the doctor said, it was a minor medication adjustment, barely a small trick. Seeing her struggling even with that made it seem like staying alive was a miracle in itself.

 

Indeed, Ulrich was a little surprised. When he got out of the car, he was momentarily speechless because Mrs. Osborne, leaning against the tree, looked like she had just died.

 

She still had a role to play.

 

He couldn’t let something useful die meaninglessly. The intention was always to instill a deep sense of guilt in Lisbell, not to sever all her ties.

 

He had ordered Mrs. Osborne to wake up from her quiet sleep just in time for his return from the capital for this reason.

 

* * *

Hello everyone. This is a very important announcement and I hope you all will read it through. As some of you may have noticed, Google Ads have been absent from our site and that’s because they’ve withdrawn ads for us. Our main source of income for site hosting was through ads, and now that it’s gone, it’ll be hard for us to keep the site on. So our humble request to the ones who can and want to help us out is, please join our kofi membership tier to support us.

It’s alright even if you can’t, we’ll try our best to keep the site alive. But we don’t want to resort to nsfw ads to get revenue so this is our only option.


The presence of her mother was somewhat of a hindrance, but Ulrich wanted a more certain shackle than that.

 

Emotions can sometimes be intense, but they can also become as thin as paper. If Lisbell’s sense of responsibility towards her bedridden mother became that thin, and if she decided to run away leaving her behind…

 

There might come a time when he could accept that fact calmly, but it wasn’t now.

 

For now, he wanted to watch over her a little longer.

 

The result was as expected but still brought a sense of relief. What happened to Lisbell today ended up chaining her with a shackle she could never remove herself. Her gloomy appearance and the somber look she had while sitting down in the pouring rain were proof of that.

 

“Transfer the lady to the hospital as soon as a room is secured in the capital.”

 

Ulrich said, tearing the paper he was holding. The word ‘Repayment Contract’ written at the top split into two. Soon, the paper was shredded beyond recognition and discarded to one side.

 

“Immediately? Do you need to move so urgently?”

 

“My impatient mother will soon issue a summons.”

 

“A summons?”

 

“Have you seen Gwen’s condition?”

 

“No. There’s a strict no-entry order except for family.”

 

“He looks like he could die tomorrow.”

 



 

“That’s why she must be anxious.”

 

Victor sighed as if he understood now.

 

A summons was a unique authority held by the head of the Altahart family, requiring any family member to return immediately to the main residence in the capital, regardless of their location. Failure to comply could result in the legal recovery of their business management rights by the head.

 

For an Altahart who established their position through management rights within the family, this was a significant loss. The only way to avoid it was to comply with the summons.

 

What Ulrich intended to do now was to prepare to avoid being caught in such a situation.

 

Wait a minute…

 

If that was true, how far ahead had he planned?

 

Victor, who was closest to Ulrich’s orders, knew that he had instructed the doctor to adjust the medication. He also knew that this was a means to completely bind the woman who had ended up stuck in this villa.

 

And this method was coincidentally leading to an easy resolution of future situations.

 

The bait Ulrich chose to tie Lisbell’s feet to this place was Mrs. Osborne. Judging by his recent actions, it was clear that Ulrich intended to take her to the capital.

 

Lisbell wasn’t staying with him because she liked him. She was only staying because of a deal involving her mother.

 

Such a woman wouldn’t willingly follow Ulrich to the capital. If he took her mother, she would resist in some way, causing significant problems in trivial matters.

 

But…

 

But would she do that now?

 

Surely this wasn’t part of the plan either.

 

Ulrich had no idea about Gwen’s condition until he visited the capital, so he couldn’t have anticipated that an anxious lady would issue a summons soon.

 

So, it’s just a coincidence…

 

Even if it was true, it was astonishing. It could only be described as a stroke of remarkable luck. In the world, luck was often referred to as a moment blessed by the gods. Otherwise, it was an inexplicable event.

 

A man who not only was born talented but also received the love of the gods.

 

“Yes, I will proceed as soon as possible.”

 

Victor, who responded in a firm voice, secretly offered sincere consolation to Lisbell.

 

Leaving Victor behind, Ulrich walked down the long hallway.

 

The only sound was his footsteps echoing through the quiet space. Having just returned from the noisy capital, he finally felt a sense of relief.

 

The noise was bearable for a day or two, but Lorraine’s chaos was exceptional.

 

Well, what can I do? It’s a world where various information and gossip are fascinating and profitable.

 

In such a peaceful scenery surrounded by nature, you can’t feel the same pure excitement, malice, and proportional pleasure that oscillates.

 

Thinking about returning to that gloomy paradise made his head throb. The fatigue he had temporarily forgotten while staying here would soon resurface, flooding him with its waves.

 

But his thoughts soon took a slight turn.

 

Even in such a dreary place, would things change if he took Lisbell with him?

 

Would it feel different?

 

This was something he was curious about.

 

Despite thinking it was nonsense, he couldn’t help but wonder if his life in the vibrant yet desolate capital would change with just one different person by his side.

 

The curiosity that sprouted like a small bud quickly grew as big as a fist. Before he knew it, Ulrich was determined to take her to the capital no matter what.

 

By then, he had already reached Lisbell’s bedroom.

 

He knocked briefly and opened the door.

 

Lisbell was sitting on the bed. Her hair, dried and stuck together messily, and her clothes, still damp and clinging to her, suggested she had been forcibly brought here.

 

Her feelings weren’t far off.

 

Why else would she sit down in the rain without even thinking of getting up? It was a clear sign that she didn’t want to return to this villa.

 

“Lisbell.”

 





There was no response to his call. Ulrich approached the bed and looked at her face.

 

Even though she was indoors, sheltered from the storm, Lisbell’s eyes still looked like a wandering stone in the storm.

 

“If you stay like this, you’ll catch a cold.”

 

There was no response again, but he didn’t expect one in the first place. So, as he spoke, Ulrich was already turning around.

 

He grabbed a towel from the attached bathroom.

 

By the time he returned to the bed, Lisbell hadn’t moved an inch. Ulrich placed the towel on her head and roughly wiped away the remaining moisture.

 

He suddenly smiled.

 

He remembered Lisbell’s eyes, staring at him helplessly from the dark forest path. Eyes like a lost child. A vulnerable side he rarely saw in the always steadfast Lisbell. Eyes that clearly showed her shaken instincts.

 

Ulrich quietly tucked away his silent laughter and grabbed Lisbell’s hair along with the towel. As he lifted her head, her face followed limply.

 

He left a light kiss on her bloodless, pale lips. He thought she might frown, but Lisbell remained still. It was as if her soul had a crack that couldn’t be filled.

 

But even this wasn’t pleasing. He didn’t know what she was thinking. Whether empty or not, he wanted to dig into her piece by piece. Feeling a crude impulse, Ulrich threw the towel onto the bed.

 

Then he grabbed Lisbell’s wrist and pulled her up.

 

“It’s better to warm up a bit more.”

 

He led her limp, half-melted body into the bathroom.

 

Standing her under the hose, he turned the faucet, and water poured out refreshingly. Unlike the rain outside, it soon turned warm and steamy.

 

He couldn’t understand. Even though it was clear that going outside would leave her chewed up by the rain, why did she insist on going out?

 

He couldn’t fundamentally understand why she would reject a place where everything was provided, like this warm water flowing out on its own.

 

He thought he knew the answer without hearing it.

 

It was probably because of the love or whatever she had mentioned herself. No matter how many times he thought about it, it was an absurd sentiment.

 

Ulrich embraced Lisbell’s waist from behind. Then he started unbuttoning her blouse one by one.

 

It was only then that her slender body, as if waking up, slightly recoiled and curled her shoulders.

* * *


She had no idea that all her struggles only resulted in pressing closer against Ulrich’s chest. If she had the presence of mind to realize this, she wouldn’t have been dragged to the bathroom in the first place.

 

Ulrich chuckled and resolutely unbuttoned her blouse.

 

The front slowly opened. However, Lisbell’s resistance did not intensify. Instead, her body, gradually exposed, trembled slightly. The sudden chill hit her as the only layer of clothing was removed.

 

With only her underwear left, she was pushed into the warm water. Although the water stream wasn’t strong, Lisbell wobbled. Ulrich held her and adjusted the faucet. His shirt also became soaked in places.

 

He brushed her tangled hair to one side. Water droplets ran down her pale, smooth skin.

 

Without hesitation, Ulrich licked it.

 

He knew it had no taste, but he did it anyway. Sometimes, with her, his brain acted as if it was partly damaged, imagining it tasted like ripe fruit juice. He instinctively placed his tongue on it.

 

Lisbell flinched as if pricked by a thorn at the touch on her shoulder. Ulrich straightened his head after a few more licks and made sure her body could regain warmth. He rubbed the water all over her, and when some parts were hard to reach, he used his cupped hand to pour water directly.

 

Lisbell’s trembling gradually subsided.

 

Ulrich, who had been persistently rubbing her protruding shoulder blades, softly whispered to her back, which was facing the wall.

 

“Come with me to the capital.”

 

There was a reaction after a brief moment. Lisbell’s fingers, which were touching the wall, curled.

 

“Why the capital….”

 

Her voice, heard for the first time since entering her bedroom, was hoarse. It was so dry that even these many water droplets couldn’t wet it.

 

Ulrich turned off the faucet. The water stream gradually died down and eventually stopped. However, her enticing skin was still covered with beads of water.

 

He bent his head toward her seemingly pristine shoulder line and answered her tiny question while hugging her deeply from behind.

 

“I have something to do in the capital.”

 

“…”

 

“I can’t leave you alone in this villa while I’m gone.”

 

He spoke as if caring for her, but his intentions were different. He still found her interesting and planned to torment her even while taking her to the capital.

 

As his sly curiosity, which he hadn’t satisfied, seeped into his elegant tone, cold sweat dripped down Lisbell’s back like water droplets.

 

Ulrich slyly licked his way up from her shoulder to her neck, kissing and sucking. Every time his lips felt wet, he swallowed as if it were her bodily fluids, thinking it truly tasted that way.

 

“In the capital, Mrs. Osborne can receive much more precise and thorough treatment.”

 

“…”

 

“The medical facilities and equipment there are far superior to here.”

 

Ulrich grasped her chin, which had been staring blankly at the wall, and turned her to face him.

 

He engulfed her pale lips, which stood out red against her pallor. After lightly probing inside with his tongue, he slowly pulled back, making the saliva stretch, and murmured while looking into her eyes.

 

“If Lisbell just follows me, you won’t have to worry about the treatment costs.”

 

There was a long silence. But it didn’t feel like a bad sign.

 

If it were the old Lisbell, she would have stubbornly refused to go to the capital, flaunting her pride.

 

Perhaps the reason she couldn’t do so now was that the unfortunate situation she encountered today, while taking her sick mother out, kept replaying in her mind.

 

Though her constant resistance was attractive, her compliance now wasn’t bad either. It was pleasing not to have to repeat unnecessary words multiple times.

 

Using her mother as a pretext to break her bamboo-like spirit once was a good move. Even if that spirit rose again, it was beneficial for him now, as it made it easier to take her to the capital.

 

To seal the deal, Ulrich turned her body to face him and said,

 

“Lisbell, all you have left is your mother now.”

 

He smoothly removed her thin underwear clinging to her naked body. Her breasts, neatly gathered, drew his gaze.

 

Gazing lasciviously for a while, he then pressed and rubbed her nipple with his fingers, emitting a slightly excited tone.

 

“So, you must prioritize your mother.”

 

The voice urging her to grow guilt was deceitful, even to him.

 

Ulrich chuckled and lowered his head. He sucked her nipple into his mouth, including the areola.

 

Lisbell’s body stiffened as he sucked hard enough to make his cheeks hollow. The rigidity of her body, which had begun when he licked her shoulder, intensified his arousal.

 

Her resistance always fueled his desire. It evoked pure pleasure, as if he were crushing the neck of something alive. Though already erect, he felt he could get even harder, eager to explore every part of her thoroughly.

 

Was lust always this destructive?

 

Perhaps. He never put in as much effort or received such a deep impression from anyone else as he did with Lisbell. Savoring the red, ripe nipple with his mouth, Ulrich’s hand moved downward.

 

“…Ah.”

 

A barely audible moan escaped Lisbell’s lips.

 

Ulrich’s fingers slid into the moist triangle between her legs. Despite the rapid progression, her hole was already moist, thanks to the flowing water.

 

Ulrich spread his palm wide, rubbing her tangled pubic hair before thrusting his long middle finger deep into her hole.

 

“Only three days.”

 

“Ah….”

 

“And it’s already this tight? Hm?”

 

He teasingly added his index finger and scratched the inner walls. Her hole, forced to swallow two thick fingers, widened and wrinkled.

 

Ulrich enjoyed the texture of her pubic hair, spreading his palm and striking down. The droplets of water that soaked her pubic hair splashed in response to the rapid movements.

 

“Haha, it splashes just like Lisbell’s fluids.”

 

“Ah, ung…!”

 

“I wish you’d get this wet quickly. There’s nothing more satisfying than having you soak my lower part with your fluids….”

 

As his fingers flipped her tender insides, Lisbell leaned against the bathroom wall, trembling. Her lower body convulsed, sucking his fingers.

 

Noticing she was getting aroused faster than he expected, Ulrich glanced down.

 

“Ung, haah.”

 

Lisbell occasionally stood on her tiptoes, unable to hide her reactions. It happened every time his palm rubbed her pubic hair. Each time he touched the densely packed area, she displayed her sensitivity without restraint.

 

Confirming his assumption, Ulrich pressed his palm firmly against her pubic area. He applied pressure, rotating it in circles, and her lower abdomen tensed. Her toes curled, scratching the floor.

 

Ulrich raised an eyebrow, realizing something and letting out a small exclamation.

 

“Come to think of it, this is where most women feel pleasure.”

 

He withdrew his fingers, now slightly moist from her fluids.

 

Taking his hand to her pubic hair, he disturbed the sparse forest and spread her flushed labia wide. His fingers quickly found the prominent nub.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

“Is this the spot you love to have rubbed?”

 

“Ah, uh… hng, yes…!”

 

Her clitoris, the source of her pleasure, was mercilessly rubbed. As he pinched, scratched, and twisted it, Lisbell squirmed, her whole body shuddering, her cries echoing through the bathroom.

Ulrich’s sly smile deepened as he felt his palm, covering her groin, becoming steadily wetter, in stark contrast to her physical resistance. His eyes gleamed with a sinister interest, reflecting an almost maniacal shine against the bathroom’s light.

 

“Haa, haah, ugh…!”

 

Desperate to pull away, Lisbell gripped his forearm, but it was futile. Every time his fingertips lingered on her clitoris, as if to leave a mark, her knees weakened and her insides tingled sharply. The sensation of every nerve pulsing throughout her body was so sensitive it was almost terrifying.

 

Ulrich watched Lisbell, weakly clutching his arm, before suddenly lowering himself.

 

“…Hmp!”

 

His fine platinum hair brushed against her groin.

 

Lisbell was so startled by him bringing his mouth below her that she couldn’t even breathe.

 

Meanwhile, Ulrich licked the wetness from her pubic hair before spreading her flesh wide in one swift motion.

 

In the center, a modestly engorged nub was gently protruding.

 

Lisbell’s thighs trembled as he flicked it with the tip of his sharp tongue. He then enveloped it with his lips, sucking it as if to consume it. Fluids gushed from her now slippery entrance.

 

Ulrich savored the rich taste from the traces around his nose and mouth. The scent, too lewd, made part of his mind deliriously insane, numbing all his senses.

 

“Ah! Hmph, ah… no, no…”

 

Lisbell shook her head frantically, her body convulsing as if in a fit. Yet each time Ulrich bit her clitoris as if to chew it, she swallowed her breath and shuddered. The nature of the sensation became clear from the torrent of fluids that followed.

 

Ulrich, now with his eyes closed, suckled her clitoris thoroughly as if kissing it. What was once too small to find without parting the flesh quickly swelled up after a few licks.

 

As if praising him, Lisbell curled her waist in resistance as he delicately worked his tongue.

 

“Hah, stay still…”

 

He was engrossed in her reactions, almost captivated, but her constant struggling began to irritate him.

 

It was as if she despised feeling pleasure from him. Once in a daze like an idiot, now she vibrantly resisted. This irked him.

 

“Ah!”

 

Ulrich grabbed her wrist and pulled her down. He caught her collapsing body and laid her on the cold bathroom floor.

 

He briefly glanced at her small, hardly shaking breasts before spreading her groin wide while she was still dazed.

 

Diving in, he pressed his lips back to her clitoris, sucking it deeply, causing her calves to tense up.

 

Her half-bent legs hit Ulrich’s shoulders and back as he intrusively delved in. But he paid no mind, busy pressing his tongue against her clitoris and the crevice beneath it.

 

“Hah, haah, ung…!”

 

The overwhelming pleasure, mixed with discomfort, hit her. Each breath she took brought a slight convulsion, a tingling chill spreading through her abdomen. Each time, Lisbell’s breath caught.

 

It was a repulsive joy.

 

Pleasure that usually left her feeling raw now felt heavily subdued.

 

She felt despicable, writhing so lewdly despite having planned to abandon her mother and failing to save her from near death.

 

“Haha, you’re soaked.”

 

“Haah, haah…”

 

“Lisbell, you actually like it, don’t you?”

 

Her awkwardly floating ankles were grabbed, spreading her vulva so wide it couldn’t be hidden. His warm, throbbing shaft rubbed against her entrance.

 

The solid vein’s soft friction made her pulse with anticipation. Lisbell felt disgusted by her body’s reaction, hating herself for feeling it.

 

“Now, let’s… ngh…”

 

“Ah, ah…!”

 

The tip, lightly stained, spread her opening wide as it penetrated. The largest part soon followed, pushing in deeply, causing her hips to curl inward.

 

“You welcome it, don’t you… haah… right?”

 

Ulrich, interpreting her body’s treacherous response in his own way, gripped her legs like reins.

 

“So let’s enjoy this. There’s no grand meaning to sex to always… making a face like you’re being dragged to hell.”

 

“Hmph, ugh…!”

 

“Ah, inside you feels really good… haa….”

 

He tilted his head back, platinum hair rustling wetly as it fell behind his forehead.

 

His closed eyes mirrored pure lust.

 

Unlike his demeanor, her insides welcomed him, growing wetter by the moment. It was a sensation that made it impossible not to thrust.

 

He pounded without hesitation. His shirt clung to his back like a rider’s, revealing his lewd hip movements. Wet slaps echoed as they collided below.

 

“Hah, haah, ugh…!”

 

Lisbell’s eyes widened at the constant scraping sensation inside, hastily covering her mouth. Even so, fragments of trembling moans escaped her lips.

 

Soon, a sharp thought pierced her mind.

 

Ah, maybe this is my punishment.

 

Being pinned and pounded by a man she didn’t want, who held her barely alive mother hostage, leaving her to cry and moan like an animal—this felt like a divine punishment for abandoning her humanity.

 

The entire time she sat in the bedroom, guilt consumed her. Watching her mother, who had lived only for her, dying while she stood helpless on the forest path twisted and wrung out her spirit.

 

She desperately wanted to say something to alleviate this guilt, but the reality that even that was out of reach drove her mad.

 

In the midst of this, sex with him became a tiny escape. Despite being revolting, horrific, and dreadful, it was the only way her blocked breath found release.

 

Receiving this punishment seemed to somewhat ease the deep-seated guilt inside her.

 

So now, I am being punished….

 

“I told you, don’t think.”

 

“…Ung, haah…!”

 

“Now is the time to focus on your mother’s recovery.”

 

“Huh, mm… mmph…!”

 

“Lisbell, you’re a good daughter. So… ugh, you need to come with me to the capital.”

 

The thoughts that had risen like black water quickly receded.

 

An empty mind felt weightless.

 

Swaying. Like a straw doll on the cold ground, her body shook without any will. Her hand, which had been covering her mouth, slowly fell to the floor.

 

Somewhere, the sound of gunshots echoed. The wetness soaking her knees felt like someone’s tears.

 

Even amid this, her tightness greeted his thrusts with warmth, feeling it obscenely and honestly moaning.

 

The moans of someone lost trailed off into the air. Even though it was her own voice, it barely reached her ears. With reality fading away, the only vivid thing was the sinister gleam in the eyes looking down at her.

 

“Do you understand?”

 

His voice demanding an answer struck her ears like bullets. With her heart already riddled with holes, Lisbell mumbled in response.

 

She couldn’t tell what she said, but when she saw him smirk the next moment, she guessed it was what he wanted.


The capital, Laurent, was peaceful.

 

That was until a single scoop leaked from the Altahart family.

 

Before dawn one morning, a brief one-line report received from a related party started the commotion.

 

All the newspapers in Laurent replaced their planned articles with this new report, filling their front pages by the early hours of the morning.

 

A family photo of the Altahart family was used on the front page. Some newspapers only featured a small cutout of Gwen, the eldest son and heir.

 

Clink.

 



 

The small sound that rang in her ears woke Lisbell.

 

Lying on her side with her eyes open, she saw people moving quietly yet busily.

 

There was no need to look further. These were the servants working at the Altahart main estate.

 

Though it wasn’t the dining room, the smell of delicious food wafted through the air. The servants were gathered around a table near the bedroom.

 

Lisbell slowly got up. One of them must have sensed her presence, as they turned towards the bed and bowed. When one greeted her, the others followed suit like shadows. Then they quickly resumed their work.

 

“…Excuse me.”

 

Lisbell opened her mouth cautiously, waiting for the right moment.

 

Her voice abruptly cut off.

 

As soon as she spoke, they stepped back, gave a polite bow, and left the bedroom in an orderly line. Lisbell stared blankly at the space they had vacated.

 

She got up from the bed and approached the table where the servants had been gathered. As expected, it was lavishly set with food meant to be eaten in the bedroom.

 

She felt a bit disoriented.

 

While she was grateful she didn’t need to go down to the dining room to eat, she was also irritated by Ulrich’s attitude of treating her like a doll trapped in a dollhouse, giving orders to the servants.

 

Before sitting at the table, Lisbell headed to the bathroom. She cupped water in her hands and washed her face first. She did this to awaken her dulled senses since coming here.

 

But today, as usual, she didn’t feel refreshed even after several washes with cold water.

 

That was how dazed she felt.

 

The fact that she was staying at the Altahart mansion in the capital was always hard to grasp.

 

“…haah.”

 

The reality hit her constantly.

 

Even the towels here were much softer than the ones she once thought were luxurious in Marnia.

 

And not just that. Even the bathroom was excessively opulent, with golden decorations that sometimes made it blindingly bright under the sun. Even the faucets and the bathtub were gilded.

 

The bedroom wasn’t much different.

 

Famous paintings hung on the walls, marble vases adorned the tables, and crystal decanters decorated the drink tables.

 

Just being surrounded by such expensive items made her feel overwhelmed. Lisbell could never feel at ease in this room, constantly worried about damaging something valuable.

 

Of course, if asked if that was the only reason for her discomfort, the answer would be no.

 

As she headed to the table, something caught Lisbell’s eye. It was today’s newspaper, folded carelessly. She picked it up.

 

{Gwen Altahart Dies, Laurent Shrouded in Mourning}

 

It had been a week since she arrived in the capital. Even when she first got here, the state of this family was splashed across the front pages of the newspapers, and now it was the same.

 

Gwen Altahart’s fate had shocked many people unexpectedly.

 

As she tilted the newspaper, ashes that had gathered in one corner scattered softly. The family photo of the Altahart family, showing Gwen Altahart sitting solemnly, was marred by black ashes.

 

Ulrich received the newspaper every day and stubbed out his cigarette on his brother’s face.

 

She only realized that “the matter in the capital” Ulrich mentioned was his brother’s death after arriving here.

 

As she glanced at the densely written article, she read that they would be transferring the body to the church for the funeral today.

 

Lisbell folded the newspaper and set it down, then headed to the table. Sitting by the window, she could see outside clearly. Instead of picking up her fork, she first took a sip of milk while glancing outside.

 

It wasn’t raining, but the weather felt gloomy. It was because of the people gathered on the lush green lawn, all dressed in black. These were the members of Ulrich’s family.

 

The Altaharts.

 

Setting down the glass, Lisbell slowly picked up her fork. As she cut into the well-seasoned omelet, her eyes landed on something.

 

Her chewing slowed.

 

A child…

 

Among the towering adults, there was a child. Dressed all in black, the child looked like they were wearing raven feathers from head to toe.

 

Were they part of the family?

 

But as far as Lisbell knew, Gwen Altahart was unmarried. And Ulrich Altahart, of course, had no children. She hadn’t heard of or met any other siblings.

 

So who was that child?

 

The thought quickly passed as it wasn’t her concern.

 

Lisbell had come to the capital solely for her mother’s treatment.

 

When she was drowning in guilt, exposed by her own vile nature, Ulrich had made her an offer she couldn’t refuse.

 

No, was it really an offer?

 

It had felt more like a timely punishment, a threat.

 

Would she abandon her mother again?

 

The sharp threat that pierced her conscience, reminding her of her wicked intention to abandon her mother during the storm.

 

Lisbell had been powerless then, and Ulrich was as meticulous as ever. When she finally gathered her wits to protest, her mother had already been transferred to the capital hospital. The repayment contract set for autumn became meaningless. Her mother’s salvation, after almost dying in the storm, depended on the life-support treatment provided in the capital. To save her mother, she had no choice but to rely on him without regard for time or cost. Therefore, Lisbell had to quietly follow Ulrich.

 



 

It was while she was gripping her fork, tasting bitterness in her mouth.

 

Unbeknownst to her, Ulrich had looked up towards this side of the bedroom.

 

Even he couldn’t go against the custom of wearing mourning clothes. Dressed in a black shirt, different from his usual white, he wore a black tie that felt somewhat stiff.

 

Despite the distance, it was clear he was staring straight at her, stroking his tie as if he was sure their eyes had met.

 

Lisbell frowned and turned her head. Her appetite, already scarce, vanished entirely, and she put down her fork with a clatter.

 

Deliberately avoiding his gaze, she continued her meal, occasionally glancing outside. At some point, Ulrich had turned and was now holding the shoulder of a woman in a black hat with a short veil.

 

It was probably his mother.

 

Cora Altahart, the current head of the family.

 

Since arriving here, Lisbell had not encountered any of his family members. She had arrived in the dead of night and existed like a fish in a bowl in his bedroom.

 

She bit the inside of her cheek.

 

Naturally, she hadn’t met her mother either. Her mother was currently hospitalized in the Royal Capital Hospital, receiving treatment far superior to what she had in Marnia.

 

Yes, she had heard.

 

It was just indirectly obtained information.

 

Since bringing her here, Ulrich had kept her confined, not allowing her to go anywhere.


Of course, no physical measures were taken. 

 

Just a psychological burden was imposed.

 

“I hope you stay quiet for a while. Unless you want that pretty face of yours plastered all over cheap gossip magazines.”

 

“What does that mean…”

 

“With Gwen’s death, the media is overly focused. They’ve gathered from areas we can control to those we can’t. Yellow journalism tends to flare up passionately at times like these. I hear from the butler that the front gate is crowded with reporters carrying cameras. If you step outside or even peek out of the window, you might catch unnecessary attention as someone not in the family photo.”

 

“…”

 

“I don’t mind if rumors spread that you’re my hidden lover, but I think Lisbell would dislike that, so I’m telling you.”

 

“…Until when?”

 

“For now, it’s best to keep a low profile until we get through Gwen’s funeral safely.”

 

“What about my mother? How can I visit my mother?”

 

“There’s a family attendant guarding her hospital room to ensure immediate contact if anything happens. So, if anything serious occurs, we’ll be informed right away.”

 

“…What about me?”

 

“…”

 

“What should I do here?”

 

He gently brushed her hair back as she sat on the bed. His large palm soon covered her pale cheek.

 

“You just need to stay.”

 

“…”

 

“Do nothing, and stay still.”

 

“…”

 

“Didn’t I make it clear?”

 

It was a lie.

 

‘Do nothing’ wasn’t true.

 

Because his hand, which had been caressing her cheek, naturally slid down and spread Lisbell’s legs. It was just a role to relieve his lust.

 

Ultimately, until the mourning for his household that swept through the capital was settled, she too had to be restricted in her actions. Lisbell also refused to get further entangled with his household.

 

Just a week ago, she thought it was natural, but it was suffocating.

 

Not being able to meet her mother, the reason she was dragged to this unfamiliar capital, troubled her daily.

 

And today was the day of Gwen’s funeral, as he mentioned.

 

The family gathered in the courtyard would soon head to the church where the funeral would take place.

 

After that, perhaps she could escape this suffocating life a bit.

 

The feeling of being controlled, from her living space to her range of activity, under his grasp, was deeply unsettling. The special locks on the windows that couldn’t be opened without the servants’ help, the grand double doors, and the other wealthy items around her seemed like the bars of a dreadful cage.

 

She habitually scratched her neck.

 

There was nothing there, but it felt like it was tightening.

 

She scratched her skin with her nails.

 

She knew it wouldn’t change anything, but couldn’t stop by instinct.

 

The unconscious act finally stopped when she saw blood.

 

She wiped the stinging spot with her sleeve.

 

Seeing the small blood stain, Lisbell decided to talk to him as soon as he returned today.

 

Ulrich returned as the sun set and the moon rose.

 

Exhausted, he went straight to the bathroom upon entering the bedroom.

 

Lisbell sat on the bed, waiting silently until he finished his shower. It was the same position she always took when he returned from outings. She was sick of it, but had nowhere else to go. Anyway, since this was his domain, Lisbell felt uncomfortable whether here or there.

 

“Did you eat?”

 

He asked, coming out of the bathroom in a loosely tied robe.

 

Lisbell turned her head silently. Ulrich looked in the direction she indicated, where the table tray was placed. The food on the plate was mostly untouched.

 

“Still quite a bit left. You didn’t eat much yesterday either. No appetite?”

 

“How can I eat comfortably when my mother’s life is uncertain?”

 

Her tone was calm, but the content was biting. Recognizing this, Ulrich smirked and sat next to her. He grabbed her slender chin with his fingers.

 

“If your mother knew her daughter was refusing to eat because of her, she’d be upset.”

 

“…Is the funeral over?”

 

“Yes, finally. I feel like I’ve heard Gwen’s name a lifetime’s worth.”

 

“Then can I go outside now?”

 

“What happened to your neck?”

 

Ulrich suddenly asked, tilting her chin. His eyes, sharper than usual, scanned the area she had scratched earlier.

 

“Did you hurt yourself?”

 

“I scratched it a bit.”

 

“Why?”

 

“It was itchy.”

 

“Still itchy?”

 

“It’s fine now.”

 

Not expecting him to be so persistent, Lisbell was slightly taken aback. She tried to push his arm away, but he continued to stare intently at the spot. Shortly after, he called for a servant. Within less than a minute, an old butler with a long mustache knocked and entered.

 

“Pavil, bring some first-aid ointment.”

 

“Should I call a doctor?”

 

“No, it’s not that serious.”

 

“Yes, young master.”

 

Ignoring Lisbell’s protests that she was fine, Ulrich firmly applied the ointment to her neck. The sensation of the salve spreading felt strange and unexplainable.

 

“Hm, no licking your neck today after applying the medicine.”

 

“…”

 

“Is it safe for humans?”

 

If he was certain it was harmless, he seemed ready to lick even this medicated neck ravenously. Even with the servant still there, he didn’t hold back his words. Lisbell pushed his arm away and widened her eyes.

 

“Please answer my question first.”

 

“What was your question?”

 

“Now that the funeral is over, can I move around freely?”

 

“Hm.”

 

“I want to visit the hospital where my mother is.”

 

“There’s been no special news from the attendant.”

 

“I want to check with my own eyes.”

 

Ulrich gestured for the butler to leave.

 

Left alone in the bedroom, he lit a cigarette. Exhaling the smoke slowly, he brushed back his hair.

 

“Do you know what my brother’s death means?”

 

“…Not really.”

 

“My brother was the heir. With him gone overnight, what’s the next step?”

 

“…”

 

“I, as the second son, must take over the succession.”

 

“And what does that have to do with me?”

 

“I’d love to take you to the hospital, but I’ll be terribly busy starting tomorrow.”

 

“I didn’t ask you to come with me. I can go alone.”

 

He played idly with her messy hair.

 

“Do you know where to go?”

 

“If you tell me the hospital.”

 

“Do you think you can go alone?”

 

“There’s no reason I can’t.”

 

Sucking on his cigarette until his cheeks hollowed, he exhaled and laughed strangely.

 

“It’d be better if I went with you.”

 

“No… I’ll decline.”

 

“Always a fortress except when spreading your legs.”

 

His fingers crawled up her knee.

 

“What about clothes?”

 

“…”

 

“You can’t visit the hospital in a slip like this. Right?”

 

When coming to the capital, Lisbell’s clothes were discarded. More precisely, Ulrich disposed of them. Since arriving, she had only worn the slips and robes his secretary provided. It was true she couldn’t go out dressed like this.

 

“I can borrow the maids’ clothes.”

 

“That would be too pitiful.”

 

“…Are you trying to stop me from going?”

 

“Me? No way.”

 

“…”

 

“I’m just a bit sad.”

 

Ulrich tucked her gray hair behind her ear. He kissed her exposed cheek deeply.

 

“You won’t even consider my offer to go together.”

 

“I just want to see my mother immediately, and you said you’d be busy for a while.”

 

“Don’t pretend to care about me. You just don’t want to be with me.”

 

His intention, obvious though it was, was hard to understand. Well, when was he ever comprehensible? Still, he caressed her eye with an unreadable smile.

 

His fingers then touched her lips.

 

“Will you kiss me?”

 

“…”

 

“If you do, I promise to prepare clothes for tomorrow and a car to the hospital.”


Ulrich thrust his face forward as if to confront himself, and closed his eyes tightly. Crackle, crackle. In the quietness surrounding the bed, only the sound of the tobacco leaves he was holding burned. Lisbell stood still, facing his sharply visible face even in the dark.

 

With his eyes closed, Ulrich’s eyebrows twitched.

 

“Aren’t you going to do it?”

 

“What does this mean to you?”

 

“I enjoy seeing how much you despise it.”

 

Despite his closed eyes, Ulrich’s voice had a hint of laughter as if he could clearly see Lisbell’s face filled with disgust. Lisbell felt an urge to slap his cheek but didn’t want to complicate the situation by acting on it.

 

“Do it like you would for a fiancé.”

 



 

“Ah, now it’s ex-fiancé.”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“I would love it if you included some tongue.”

 



 

“Hurry up.”

 

Lisbell clenched her fists tightly. She felt something wrapping around her neck again, which had just been treated. Her breathing became shallow, and her chest tightened. She wanted to scratch her neck wildly, knowing it wouldn’t help. It was an abnormal behavior caused by psychological erosion.

 

Just think about Mother.

 

It had already been a week since she last saw her mother. The vividness of the final memory was torturous. Her frail figure leaning against a tree as if dead, or before that, barely walking through the rain. No, before that… her mother, sincerely grieving and angry amidst many truths Lisbell confessed in desperation.

 

She shouldn’t have said anything.

 

She should have kept quiet and swallowed it down.

 

If she had… would things be different now?

 

It was a useless regret. Given the situation, Lisbell had to take responsibility for her mother until the end. So, she wanted to see her condition as soon as possible.

 

Holding onto this thought, Lisbell brought her lips to Ulrich’s. It was hardly a kiss, more like a mere contact.

 

She knew she had to act quickly to satisfy the vile man, but her uncomfortable state made it hard to think clearly. Her insides felt twisted in different directions. Initiating physical contact with him brought a dizzying feeling.

 

“…Mm…!”

 

Her body was pushed back. Ulrich, who had been still, suddenly embraced her waist. He chuckled between their joined lips.

 

“Still clumsy.”

 

“Ugh…”

 

“But cute, so I’ll let it slide.”

 



 

“It would be better if you came with me.”

 

“I can go alone.”

 

“Then suit yourself.”

 

As he climbed on top of her, he pulled up her slip. She didn’t even bother with underwear anymore since all she did here was have sex with him. Her bare groin was exposed.

 

Her body, accustomed to the intercourse, began to move slowly. Lisbell bit her lip, staring at the ceiling. The usual nausea-like sensation arose. The thought of seeing her mother tomorrow made it bearable.

 

***

 

Sunlight cutting through the bedding awakened the morning.

 

Lisbell opened her eyes slowly in a daze. Even after a while, there were no signs of anyone else. As he mentioned, he seemed to have left early for his busy schedule starting tomorrow.

 

Rising slightly, she noticed a dress hanging in the makeshift closet. It seemed to be the dress he had promised as a reward for the kiss. Throwing off the blanket, Lisbell quickly grabbed a gown and headed to the closet.

 



 

A white undershirt with a black ribbon and a plain black flared skirt, matching the ribbon.

 

Lisbell touched the blouse’s sleeve. The flowing material was undoubtedly silk, unlike her stiff shirts, which were soft and elegant.

 

Ulrich’s preparation was perfect. Inside the clothes, there were silk stockings and lace gloves, as if for a noblewoman. Feeling it was unnecessary, she omitted the gloves.

 

Seeing it confirmed it didn’t suit her, but with her clothes disposed of, she had no choice.

 

She couldn’t visit her mother in her slip dress from the bedroom, as Ulrich suggested.

 

While sighing, she noticed a note on the mantelpiece. It said to call a servant when she was ready. Unconsciously clutching the note, she looked around. Though he wasn’t there, it felt as if he was watching her every move, giving her chills.

 

She hesitated but pulled the bell rope to leave for the hospital quickly. After a moment, the door opened with a knock. It was the old butler, Pavil, who had brought the medicine yesterday.

 

“I plan to visit the hospital where my mother is admitted.”

 

“I have been instructed by the second young master. The car is ready, please follow me.”

 

Lisbell followed the butler, who treated her like a family member, feeling uneasy. Now she could finally take a proper look at the inside of the Altarhart estate. The first day she arrived, it was too foggy to see anything clearly, and she wasn’t in the mood to look.

 

The bedroom was luxurious, but seeing the hallway and other spaces, it seemed normal for such an estate. It made her understand how the Marniha villa could be merely a ‘villa.’

 

“The mansion is still in disarray despite the funeral of Master Gwen being over. To avoid drawing attention, we have arranged for you to leave through the back gate.”

 

The butler said as he opened the door to a luxurious car. His politeness felt excessive and made her feel sick, as if she had a special relationship with Ulrich.

 

Nodding slightly, she got into the car.

 

“Philip, the driver, will guide you once you arrive at the hospital.”

 

The door closed. The car moved, the gravel under the fountain crunching as the wheels rolled. The car quickly left the townhouse.

 

Entering the main road, the buildings around them grew larger.

 

The path along the calmly flowing river was unfamiliar.

 

The trees lining the streets were colorful, fitting for autumn, and the grand fountain beneath the majestic statue sprayed water high.

 

They passed a park with a central blue clock tower and scattered benches, and restaurants and coffee houses, preparing for business, opened their terraces early, creating a lively atmosphere.

 

After taking in the unfamiliar sights, the car stopped in front of a building.

 

“We’ve arrived.”

 

Philip, the driver, introduced himself and got out, leading the way. Following him, Lisbell quietly clenched her hands.

 

Had her mother woken up since arriving in the capital? If so, what did she remember? Did she remember trying to escape with her? Had her condition improved? Was it the same? The capital’s medical skills should be far better than those of a small town, but if there was still no improvement, what should she do…

 

Lost in thought, she noticed the surroundings had become eerily quiet. She looked up. This place felt different from the usual ward with patients and nurses.

 

In the distance, there was a double door. A woman sitting in front, handling paperwork, stood up sensing their approach.

 

Philip explained their visit. The woman, after a brief wait, went inside the double doors and soon returned. She looked around as if searching for someone.

 

“Did you come with Ulrich Altarhart?”

 

“No.”

 

“Then, unfortunately, visiting is not allowed.”

 

Lisbell was taken aback by the unexpected refusal. She opened her mouth to speak but only managed to stammer, not understanding.

 

“I’m here to see my mother.”

 

“Yes, I confirmed your purpose of visiting Helen Osborne.”

 

“But how can you deny a family member a visit…”

 

“I’m sorry, but visits are only allowed when accompanied by Ulrich Altarhart.”


I don’t know what kind of absurd situation this is. Feeling her mind heavy and tangled, Lisbell took a step towards the woman.

 

“I don’t understand. I am the family of the patient, not Mr. Altahart. So why can I only visit if he’s present?”

 

“That’s the policy.”

 

“What kind of policy?”

 

As she shot back the question, the woman glanced awkwardly at the double doors behind her.

 

“It won’t matter what you say to me. If you want to visit Helen Osborne, please accompany Mr. Ulrich Altahart.”

 

Even if she didn’t know exactly what was going on, one thing was clear: the woman had no intention of stepping aside. As despair began to engulf her mind, Lisbell suddenly remembered the conversation she had with Ulrich last night.

 

“It would be better if you go with me.”

 

“Still, it would be better if you go with me.”

 

Now she understood why the man had been so compliant. He had foreseen this. For some reason, he knew that she wouldn’t be able to see even a strand of her mother’s hair if she came to the hospital alone.

 

Lisbell pressed her lips together and looked past the woman at the double doors.

 

“Is my mother really in there?”

 

“Yes, she is registered as a patient.”

 

“Is she okay? Is there anything wrong with her?”

 

“I’m sorry, but I cannot disclose any information about the patient.”

 

Her stomach churned.

 

This wasn’t much better than when she was in Marnia. No matter how good the treatment, what good was it if she couldn’t verify it with her own eyes?

 

Though she was filled with self-reproach, that was all. No matter how she felt, the double doors remained firmly closed. There was only one way to open them: by coming with Ulrich.

 

With a bitter taste in her mouth, Lisbell had no choice but to leave the hospital.

 

Back at the mansion, having returned in the car driven by Philip, Lisbell was consumed by a sense of helplessness she had never felt before. Even during her time in Marnia, she often felt useless, but never as despondent as this.

 

It was because she kept feeling like she had made a terrible mistake.

 

The thought that her mother’s life was now completely in Ulrich Altahart’s hands filled her with a dizzying anxiety.

 

Despite being the sole guardian, she was denied visitation rights that were easily granted to him. The name thrust in front of her every time she tried to see her mother was Ulrich’s.

 

Is there any way out of this situation?

 

“…Ugh.”

 

Suddenly, she felt something stuck in her chest. Clutching her chest, Lisbell staggered and collapsed onto the edge of the bed. On the bed that was far too large for her frame, she curled up and scratched at her neck.

 

No matter how many times she clawed at her skin, the feeling didn’t go away. Gasping for breath like someone on the verge of death, she suddenly smelled a faint scent of blood.

 

She raised her trembling hand. There was cold blood caked under her nails. All sorts of troubling thoughts crowded in. Her mind became chaotic, like a messy sketchbook.

 

“When that happens, sometimes the best thing to do is not to think at all.”

 

Yet, she would lose all her strength in an instant, recalling those words that had been planted inside her like brainwashing.

 

Don’t think….

 

Is it really that I think too much?

 

Is that why my head hurts so much?

 

Lethargy gradually consumed her consciousness.

 

Lisbell wiped her hand on the pristine sheets. After repeating this several times, she closed her eyes. Severe exhaustion brought sleep to the brink. It felt like she was sinking into water.

 

***

 

A touch on her neck disturbed her sleep. Unlike in the morning, she didn’t furrow her brow. It was already night, with only a few lights dimly illuminating the dark surroundings.

 

At first, she only recognized the presence in front of her as a silhouette, but it soon became clearer.

 

“This makes the treatment feel pointless.”

 

Ulrich, fiddling with her neck, chided. Something sticky was applied as his hand moved. Then she realized he was applying ointment, just like the previous night.

 

Looking at him with eyes darkened by the night, she spoke in a slightly hoarse voice.

 

“I went to the hospital but couldn’t see my mother.”

 

“That’s why I told you. It’s better if you go with me.”

 

As expected, he wasn’t surprised at all.

 

“…Why didn’t you tell me?”

 

“Because I’ve experienced it myself.”

 

Ulrich, who had crouched beside the bed to match her height, turned slightly. Running low on ointment, he squeezed out some more. He applied it to her neck and leisurely met her gaze. His eyes, which blended into the dark atmosphere, were both beautiful and eerie.

 

“Lisbell, because you think too much, it’s faster for you to understand things by experiencing them.”

 



 

“If I had told you the truth, would you have believed me?”

 

He chuckled softly.

 

“No, you would have just gotten upset and made things difficult for me, like before.”

 

Lisbell clenched the blanket under her hand.

 

“…She’s my mother.”

 

“I know.”

 

“She’s my mother, so why can’t I see her?”

 

“That’s a bit off. It’s not that you can’t see her.”

 



 

“You can see her if I’m with you.”

 

“But I’m her guardian.”

 

“Ha, do you really think so?”

 

His laugh was forced. It was nothing more or less than a sneer.

 

That’s why Lisbell couldn’t accept even the touch of his hand treating her neck. She had read somewhere that one method of torture involves inflicting wounds, then treating them, and then wounding the same spot again. Perhaps he intended to torment her in that way.

 

“Now, I’m your mother’s guardian, Lisbell.”

 



 

“If I’ve saved her twice, I should at least be able to play that role, shouldn’t I?”

 

“…I want to see my mother.”

 

“Later.”

 

“Later when?”

 

“When my situation calms down.”

 



 

“Well, depending on how you behave, I might change my mind. I’m quite fickle, you know.”

 

“Behave…?”

 

“If you act nicely, I might make time for you.”

 

Not knowing exactly what he meant by acting nicely, but knowing that it would likely be something she could never willingly do given how he had tormented her in various ways, Lisbell looked at him with a sense of desolation. As he wiped his fingers smeared with ointment residue, he suddenly laughed.

 

“The clothes suit you better than I thought.”

 

There was a sticky satisfaction in his leisurely gaze. It was the exact opposite of her feelings, so she couldn’t help but speak her mind.

 

“I don’t think so.”

 

“If I want to take them off right now, they must suit you.”

 



 

“If I have time, should we go shopping for clothes together?”

 

“If we have time, it would be better to visit my mother first.”

 

Ulrich, who was still fully dressed in his business attire from tie to cufflinks, stood up.

 

“Let me just tell you that this attitude is not at all attractive.”

 

Taking off his jacket, Ulrich spoke.

 

“Shall we eat first? I heard from Pavel that you skipped meals all day. I haven’t eaten yet either. Let’s go down together; I’ll show you around the mansion.”

 

Lisbell slowly sat up. Although she wanted to stay in the room, realizing that her chance to see her mother depended on Ulrich made it difficult. Coupled with what he had just said, she had no choice but to get out of bed.

 

Although she wanted to walk as far away from him as possible, he held her waist as they moved, making it impossible. Practically leaning against him, she barely noted the locations of the study, the reception room, the indoor pool, and the terrace-attached tea room before arriving at their destination: the dining room.

 

Contrary to her expectation that it would be empty, as Ulrich had led her confidently, there were already people inside, illuminated by the chandelier’s light.

 

Two men and women. Lisbell hesitated as she saw them.

 

“Oh my, Mother.”

 

A beautiful woman with honey-blonde hair turned her head elegantly. Her eyes, exactly like Ulrich’s, looked this way—blue-gray, beautiful yet eerie.


Next to her sat a handsome man with captivating red hair. Though their relationship was unclear, the atmosphere was peculiar.

 

“I didn’t expect to see you here,” he said, while Lisbell boldly walked into the dining room she didn’t dare enter easily.

 

“It’s been so long since I saw you in the dining room. You always eat in your bedroom.”

 

Not only was he undeterred, but he also headed straight for the spot opposite the two seated individuals. A quietly appearing butler pulled out a chair for him, and he sat, sending a questioning glance towards Lisbell, who was still standing by the door.

 

Lisbell approached him hesitantly, as if walking on a thorny path, clutching her skirt.

 

“Didn’t you say that was a privilege exclusive to a lady?”

 

“It’s enough to enjoy such privileges in the bright morning. Staying in the bedroom until evening would make the servants see you as too lazy.”

 

The lady calmly responded to her son’s pointed remark, her gaze now fixed on the approaching Lisbell.

 

Lisbell felt suffocated under the scrutinizing stares of four floating blue-gray eyes. As soon as she sat on the chair the butler had pulled out, she met the lady’s piercing gaze. Despite its gentle color, it was sharp enough to make her spine tingle.

 

“Pavil, what are you doing?” Ulrich said, looking at the butler holding the decanter.

 

“You should send away uninvited guests who don’t belong here.”

 

There was no doubt who he was referring to—the handsome man with red hair sitting next to the lady.

 

“Uninvited guest? Are you referring to the unfamiliar young lady sitting next to you?” the lady pointedly remarked, her gaze still fixed on Lisbell.

 

“I’m talking about that leech who has no shame and flatters my mother,” Ulrich retorted, disparaging his mother’s lover. The atmosphere quickly turned tense. Despite four people being present, no one spoke, and the air grew heavy. Only the hosts of the house remained composed.

 

The lady sighed softly.

 

“If you want to discuss qualifications, I won’t stop you, but I wonder if you have the right to be so confident, Ulrich. I have never seen the young lady sitting next to you before. How should I interpret a stranger sitting in this mansion’s dining room?”

 

“Well, I think our perspectives are a bit different.”

 

“Different? How?”

 

“I’m single, but you’re married.”

 

“…”

 

“I’m not such an ungrateful son that I can look favorably on my mother’s lover who has shamelessly taken my father’s place.”

 

As the mother and son exchanged tense words, the food began to be served one by one. Lisbell held her breath in the heavy atmosphere, wondering if she could even eat in such a situation.

 

Ulrich, having casually sipped from his glass, narrowed his eyes at the handsome man across from him.

 

“You seem to be around for quite a while this time. What do you like so much about him?”

 

“…”

 

“Is it his good looks? His body? Or… is it because he’s more capable in bed than he looks?”

 

He wasn’t the type to get drunk easily after just one sip. Hence, his words were carefully considered, and in this sense, he was truly unrestrained. His tone was refined, but his words were enough to humiliate someone. The lady sighed again.

 

“Julian.”

 

The red-haired man responded promptly to the call.

 

“Yes, ma’am.”

 

“You should go upstairs now.”

 

With that one sentence, Julian stood up without hesitation. He bent over and kissed the back of the lady’s hand with a light smack. His actions seemed oddly frivolous, not weighted with genuine experience but rather like he was mimicking the nobility he had observed.

 

Julian, having finished his farewell to the lady, walked towards the door.

 

Before leaving, he exchanged a brief, unreadable glance with Lisbell, leaving a strangely uncomfortable impression as he exited.

 

“Now that Julian is gone, shouldn’t you also send her away?” the lady said.

 

“What do you mean?”

 

“I mean the young lady sitting next to you. Are you going to keep her here?”

 

“Even if I send her away, she needs to eat first.”

 

Ulrich responded indifferently, pulling a few plates toward Lisbell to encourage her to eat. He himself only sipped from his glass, causing Lisbell to feel nauseated.

 

It was inevitable that the lady, observing this from up close, would make a remark.

 

“I don’t know how you can be so selfish.”

 

“Indeed, I wonder who I take after,” Ulrich replied nonchalantly.

 

“…”

 

“It certainly doesn’t seem to be Father…”

 

The lady sighed, seemingly exasperated, and signaled the butler with her eyes. The approaching butler refilled her glass. The lady glanced at Lisbell, who was awkwardly forking her food.

 

“What’s your name?”

 

“Lisbell Osborne.”

 

“How do you know my son?”

 

“We met in Marnia.”

 

“…Ulrich. Is the young lady unable to speak for herself? Do you have to answer for her?”

 

Ulrich responded calmly to his mother’s pointed reprimand.

 

“She’s pregnant. I have to help her out.”

 

“…What?”

 

The lady’s shock quickly turned to confusion as Lisbell erupted in a fit of coughing. The bread piece she had been swallowing seemed almost to come back up as she stared wide-eyed at Ulrich.

 

He casually continued to slice her meat while smiling at her.

 

“I told you before, didn’t I? She’s pregnant.”

 

“…”

 

“With triplets.”

 

“Ulrich.”

 

“Aren’t you happy? You always said you wanted grandchildren soon. Now you have three at once. It’s a family blessing. It might even be a gift from Gwen.”

 

Ulrich, having effectively silenced his mother, went a step further and gently touched Lisbell’s stomach. Even though her belly was flat, his act was so convincing that even Lisbell momentarily wondered if she was indeed pregnant. After a brief reflection on their encounters, she knew it was impossible, as their intimate moments had mostly involved withdrawal.

 

Seeing Lisbell’s shocked expression, the lady quickly realized her son was spouting nonsense again.

 

As if to say more, she pursed her lips but deemed it pointless and rose from her seat. The butler helped adjust her shawl.

 

“Yes, I forgot that sometimes your stubbornness surpasses Gwen’s. My beloved son, you may know best, but make sure no rumors spread outside.”

 

“I will be as thorough as you, Mother.”

 

“I mean it. Did you not think to cover her neck when bringing her here?”

 

Lisbell hurriedly pulled her disheveled gray hair over her neck. Although it now covered her nape, it was too late.

 

“Remember, eyes are watching you.”

 

“Yes, have sweet dreams.”

 

“You don’t need to push me out.”

 

The lady, having sternly scolded her stubborn son, left the dining room, her heels clicking on the floor.

 

After the storm, an uncomfortable silence filled the room. Lisbell, still dazed, looked at Ulrich. He continued eating nonchalantly. Noticing her stare, he lazily turned his head, his gaze as sharp as his mother’s, sweeping over Lisbell’s nape.

 

“Hmm… Are you worried my sexual preferences might seem violent?”

 

Muttering to himself, Ulrich gestured to the food on Lisbell’s plate.

 

“Don’t just sit there, eat. Unless you actually want to get pregnant.”

 

The repeated mention of pregnancy startled Lisbell. She flinched at the chilling sensation.

 

“The food is drugged.”

 

“…”

 

“I don’t welcome children either.”

 

That was the first bit of reassuring news she’d heard.

 

Finally, Lisbell moved her hands, cutting the meat into small pieces and eating it. The environment and people were far from comfortable, and she could hardly taste the food, but she forced herself to eat, thinking it was a means to avoid pregnancy.

 

Inside, the only sound that occasionally broke the silence was the clinking of dishes.

 

Beside the man leisurely sipping his drink, Lisbell recalled the conversation that had filled this space a little while ago. The sharp, pointed sentences aimed at each other were not something one would expect from a normal relationship.

 

Strictly speaking… it wasn’t something she cared about. No matter what happened to them, it had nothing to do with her. Lisbell just remembered her mother, whom she couldn’t see today despite visiting the hospital.

 

Just as she was not yet acclimated to the vast Laurent mansion, her mother would be utterly bewildered if she regained consciousness.

 

Would the hospital staff explain things properly to her? Or would they neglect her, thinking it was someone else’s problem? If that happened, how confused would her mother be….

 

Once the thought crossed her mind, her worries grew uncontrollably. She kept picturing her mother, sitting pale as a sheet in the pouring rain. Thump Thump Thump… her relentless heartbeat slowing down.

 

Was there no way to help?

 

No matter what she said, the man remained relaxed, as if he was deaf. Even though he acted like a generous person, his demeanor, which seemed to take responsibility for her mother to bind her, was hard to believe.

 

Especially since her mother, just before fainting again, had heard everything about the situation from her. Knowing that they were still relying on Ulrich’s help, despite remembering him, would confuse her mother greatly. Lisbell needed a way to reassure her.

 

“…I just want to ask, just in case.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Could you deliver a letter to my mother?”

 

“A letter?”

 

“If my mother has regained consciousness, she must be very shocked by the sudden change in her surroundings.”

 

Ah, he let out a short exclamation.

 

As if thinking about something, he tilted his glass, then soon smiled smoothly.

 

“Sure, I’ll deliver it.”

 



 

“It’s not a difficult thing.”

 

Lisbell almost thanked him for a moment. And she was appalled at herself for it.

 

The human heart was so fickle. The one who orchestrated all this misery was Ulrich. There was no doubt about that.

 

Yet she felt gratitude for his trivial kindness of delivering a letter. Her spine tingled unpleasantly.

 

“So, say thank you.”

 

She felt like she was encountering the version of herself he had once manipulated. Though she believed she was struggling to break free from his grip, the unsettling feeling that she was being tamed by him crept in.

 

It was absurd. Lisbell weakly shook her head, suppressing the words that almost slipped out.

 

The urge to speak, buried inside, made her neck itch as if a living creature was wriggling there. If no one was watching, she might have used all ten fingers to tear at her flesh.

 

Realizing she had just finished eating, she gritted her teeth and endured. The dinner setting was as grueling as that.

 

***

 



 

Wearing only a slip that revealed her body’s curves, Lisbell stared intently at the mantelpiece in her bedroom.

 

This was her current morning routine.

 

Upon waking, she didn’t even think about properly dressing but went to the mantelpiece in a daze. She checked if the letter she had left the previous night was still there. The letter she had painstakingly written in the study vanished every morning. Ulrich, who left early, likely took it.

 

From the day after she cautiously brought up the topic in the dining room, this routine became common.

 

The disappearing letters each day meant that Ulrich was delivering them to her mother. Yet, she didn’t know why she felt a sharp alertness each time she found the empty mantelpiece.

 

It wasn’t a feeling of relief. It was a hard-to-describe sense of foreboding that gnawed at her brain.

 

Considering what she had suffered at the hands of this man, it was only natural that she couldn’t fully accept this seemingly smooth process.

 

But what good was feeling ominous?

 

All she could do was this.

 

Write letters, leave them on the mantelpiece that had become an unspoken agreed spot, and confirm with her own eyes that they were gone.

 

Even if she harbored suspicions, there was nothing she could do. If she unwittingly annoyed Ulrich, the day she could see her mother might be further delayed. Rash actions were forbidden.

 

Regret always hit hard.

 

If only that rainy day, when she considered abandoning her mother and felt like a monster, hadn’t happened.

 

If that incident, which left her with an unshakeable guilt even after coming to the capital, hadn’t occurred….

 

So many thoughts….

 

Was she really like that?

 

So now, was she ruminating over things she couldn’t change?

 

“…Ah.”

 

Suddenly realizing her hand was hovering around her neck out of habit, Lisbell headed to the bathroom before her deepening thoughts could add more fatigue.

 

She approached the wardrobe, holding her dripping wet hair. The wardrobe, once filled with nothing but sensual slips, now held several new blouses and skirts, bought by Ulrich since that day.

 

As if taking a new hobby in dressing her up like a doll, he filled the wardrobe with clothes to his taste. Ulrich’s dressing room was separate from the bedroom, so everything in there was Lisbell’s.

 

Picking the neatest outfit, Lisbell left the bedroom. Writing the daily letter in the study was now part of her morning routine. She moved silently towards the study she had just grown accustomed to.

 



 

Rounding the corner, Lisbell encountered an unexpected scene.

 

A child with a tear-streaked face clung to a pillar, and a red-haired man crouched in front of the child.

 

Neither of them were complete strangers.

 

The child had been seen among the gathered family at Gwen Altahart’s funeral, and the red-haired man, Julian, was the one who stood beside Mrs. Altahart when she accidentally walked into the dining room.

 

Although not well-acquainted, Lisbell couldn’t just walk by. The scene looked as if Julian was bullying the child.

 

The child’s face, pressed against the pillar with evident fear, and Julian’s hand tapping the child’s shoulder, appeared quite menacing.

 

As she hesitated, her eyes met the tearful eyes of the child. The sight reminded her of the orphans at Misley Orphanage, where she spent time with Theodore. The child seemed about their age.

 

“Excuse me.”

 

By the time she realized it, she had already approached them.

 

“What are you doing right now?”

 

Julian turned his head. Seeing Lisbell, his eyes widened in surprise, and he straightened up.

 

“Hello.”

 

He greeted her nonchalantly.

 

Lisbell watched him silently, then glanced at the child. The child, also surprised by her sudden intervention, stared at her with clear, teary eyes. The child’s hair was a bright platinum blonde, just like the hair of the man she had clung to last night.

 

“This child, despite knowing me, tried to pass by without greeting. So, I was teaching manners personally.”

 

“Is that so?”

 

Julian responded with a shrug. Lisbell sighed softly.

 

“I don’t think your intentions were bad. But it could easily be misunderstood.”

 

“Misunderstood?”

 

“It looked like you were bullying this child.”

 



 

“Look at the child’s face.”

 

Pointing at the tear-streaked face, Julian turned his head, embarrassed. Lisbell stepped closer to the pillar, partially shielding the child.

 

“Education is necessary, but I don’t think pushing the child like this is needed.”

 

“Pushing? I think that’s a misunderstanding.”

 

Julian, feeling awkward, rubbed his neck and stepped back.

 

“If someone else sees this, it could complicate things. I’ll leave now. But I want to emphasize that what you saw is a misunderstanding.”

 

“Yes, I hope so too.”

 

Julian turned away with an inscrutable smile. When he kissed the back of the lady’s hand in the dining room, he seemed courteous and sincere, but now, facing him separately, he had the aura of a common thug from the back alleys.

Lisbell stayed in place until he turned the corner and disappeared. Finally, she turned around only after he vanished.

 

The terrified child was still clinging to the pillar. She couldn’t even wipe away the tear pooling in his eyes, as if paralyzed by fear. Feeling sorry for him, Lisbell bent down and sat.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

When she spoke in a small voice, the child jumped as if he had been struck by a spark. Hiccups. Soon after, her shivering turned into hiccups. Despite approaching as gently as possible, even that seemed too much for the child.

 

Lisbell wasn’t unfamiliar with such a sight. When she stayed at the orphanage for volunteer work, a newly admitted child had been in a similar state. The child had come to the orphanage after being intentionally neglected by her mother in the busy streets one morning.

 

At first, the child struggled to adapt to the orphanage but gradually opened up to the kind adults and other orphans in the same situation. Now, she had become so cheerful that she took the lead in organizing games.

 

“Lisbell! Look here.”

 

“Hey, hey, Lisbell. What is a fallen apple?”

 

That child was Mary, the bob-haired orphan who approached her and handed her an apple too beautiful to be called a fallen apple.

 

That child’s actions reminded her of Mary’s early days. With a nostalgic smile, Lisbell reached out her hand to the child. The child, who couldn’t even wipe away his tears, shuddered and fled in the opposite direction.

 

“Hey…!”

 

Lisbell tried to chase after him belatedly, but the child had already run far away. Whatever treatment he had endured, his defense mechanisms were incredibly strong. It made him feel even more out of place in this mansion, which was filled with confidence and arrogance.

 

Lonely and desolate….

 

Lisbell sometimes felt this way because it was like seeing her own shadow—unable to fit in or blend harmoniously, always out of place.

 

Standing alone in the hallway, Lisbell swallowed her breath and headed to the library, her original destination.

 

She wrote and sealed today’s letter. Although that was all she had to do, she didn’t return to her bedroom.

 

She hated her bedroom because it only made her feel her helplessness. The memory of the previous night also left an unpleasant aftertaste. It was a sensation she would never get used to. That’s why she preferred to read in the library rather than her room, even though she could take the book with her.

 

While turning the pages of her book in a corner seat, hoping to avoid anyone, she felt a presence in the once quiet space. She glanced around but saw no one. Instead, a long shadow on the floor indicated the presence of a child, not an adult.

 

Curious, Lisbell put down her book and approached the source. Again, a startled figure darted away. She saw the back of the fleeing figure clearly this time.

 

Had the child returned after running away?

 

She wanted to ask, but the child had long since disappeared.

 

Although a bit concerned, Lisbell didn’t go looking for the child. After all, she wasn’t in a position to prioritize others in this grand mansion, where even taking care of herself was a challenge.

 

She tried to ignore it, but it wasn’t easy.

 



 

As Lisbell headed to the library like any other day, she turned around.

 

A child who had been following her in secret quickly hid behind a pillar.

 

Standing still and waiting, she saw the child’s small head peeking out, driven by curiosity. When their eyes met, the child flinched again but didn’t completely hide this time.

 

Lisbell smiled awkwardly at the child.

 

From that day on, the child followed Lisbell wherever she went.

 

It started with the child revealing their presence as a shadow in the library and gradually progressed to approaching Lisbell visibly. However, the child never came closer than a certain distance, as if drawing an invisible line.

 

Today, Lisbell knelt down, looking into the child’s curious, light brown eyes. As Lisbell lowered herself to the child’s level, the child clung more tightly to the pillar. With a gentle smile, Lisbell gestured for the child to come closer.

 

The child shook her head weakly. When Lisbell mouthed, “Why?” the child hesitated. Lisbell, smiling a bit more, gestured again for the child to come closer. The child slowly stepped out from behind the pillar.

 

Waiting patiently to avoid scaring him, Lisbell watched as the child took small steps forward. Soon, the child was within arm’s reach, though he still avoided eye contact nervously.

 

Lisbell carefully reached out. The child flinched but didn’t run away this time. Lisbell waited until the child’s trembling subsided, then gently patted his hair.

 

“What’s your name?”

 

Lisbell asked softly, but the child bit his lip and shook his head again. Unsure of the meaning, Lisbell tilted her head in confusion. Was the child unable to speak? She wondered.

 

At that moment, footsteps approached from the side.

 

The child, who had just calmed down, was startled like a scared rabbit, shook off Lisbell’s hand, and ran in the opposite direction. Watching the child’s retreating back, Lisbell looked down at her own palm.

 

The child was gone, but the warmth she had felt remained in her hand.

 

***

 

“Ah…!”

 

Sweat trickled down her upturned chin. Her chest, pressed against the man’s, rubbed against his skin. Ulrich, who had been thrusting into her with relentless force, withdrew at the last moment and rubbed his flesh against her spread thighs.

 

With a heavy breath, Ulrich found Lisbell’s lips and kissed her deeply, intertwining their tongues as he continued to move against her soft thighs. The thick fluid spilled from the tip of his throbbing member.

 

“Uh…”

 

Lisbell’s platinum hair rustled down. Her slip had long since been discarded, leaving her loosely wrapped in a robe that barely covered her heaving breasts.

 

The sensual waves in the darkness continued as her body writhed. It was impossible to stop, driven by the man’s tongue licking her entrance directly.

 

Ulrich enjoyed the tightness of her trembling walls, reaching deep inside her with his tongue after bringing her to climax.

 

Her soft inner walls squeezed the warm flesh of his tongue, sucking it in hungrily. Every time he swirled his tongue inside her, wet sounds filled the room. He didn’t mind the increasing moisture, swallowing it down his throat.

 

“Ugh… uh.”

 

Lisbell covered her mouth with the back of her hand. Her ragged breaths came out in rapid succession. She didn’t want to react, but her body, already surrendered to pleasure, writhed beneath him in joy.

 

Ulrich, who was fervently licking her below, finally raised his head when his face was drenched. His red tongue slid out of her, gleaming in the dim light, dripping with her fluids, enhancing his provocative image.

 

He licked his lips and inserted two fingers into her mouth.

 

“Ugh…”

 

“You forgot to release your excitement here.”

 



 

“Should I spit?”

 

Lisbell’s face twisted slightly. Reading her discomfort, Ulrich smirked and swirled his fingers inside her mouth, pushing them so deep that she gagged before he pulled them out, now coated in her saliva.

 

Turning on her side, Lisbell blinked at the clock. It was close to two in the morning.

 

A time that no longer felt unexpected.

 

Busy with succession work, Ulrich often returned to the mansion at such late hours and frequently woke Lisbell, already asleep, with his impromptu sexual advances.


When the heavy heat in her belly and the chilling tension in her body woke her up, Ulrich’s weight was pressing down on her again.

 

Ulrich would strip her as he pleased, thrust as he wished, and continue until he was satisfied. As a result, Lisbell felt completely drained. Trapped in this mansion, her only activity was sex with him, and even that left her exhausted for the entire day.

 

There was also a deep sense of self-loathing. Reflecting on her past, she couldn’t shake the feeling of being a tool for a man’s sexual desires.

 

A chilling voice echoed in her mind, urging her not to think further. Lisbell buried her face deeply into the pillow, not wanting to feel more pain.

 

Ulrich, downing a glass of whiskey, removed the blanket as he went to wash up. The sound of running water from the bathroom tempted her to continue her disturbed sleep, but surprisingly, her mind was clear. Only her body felt heavy and sore.

 



 

Lisbell rubbed her cheek against the pillow and brought her clenched hand in front of her eyes.

 

She recalled the platinum hair that had lightly brushed against her hand. Hair that resembled Ulrich’s but left a vastly different impression.

 

As she idly recalled this, Ulrich returned from his shower. Still with work to do, he sat at a desk lit by a lamp, reviewing documents. Listening to the rustling papers, Lisbell cautiously spoke up.

 

“There was a child in the mansion.”

 

Ulrich, who had been turning a page with an unlit cigarette in his mouth, looked at her.

 

“Did you meet them?”

 

Did she meet them? It was hard to say. After she had helped the child in distress, the child had followed her around, but she didn’t feel the need to mention it in detail. Facing Ulrich’s sharp gaze, she felt she shouldn’t.

 

“Where?”

 

“I saw them while passing through the corridor… by chance.”

 

“Did you greet them?”

 

“No. If it’s a sensitive matter, you can pretend you didn’t hear it.”

 

“It’s not that sensitive.”

 

“…Who are they?”

 

“Gwen’s illegitimate child.”

 

She had suspected it. Just by their hair color, she could guess they were related to the family.

 

Also, Julian’s behavior made more sense now. From their previous conversation, she had gathered he was Mrs. Altahart’s lover… or something similar. Was it okay for someone like him to treat a family member so poorly? Perhaps he took advantage of the child’s ambiguous status as an illegitimate child.

 

“Is the child only in this mansion?”

 

“Yes.”

 

“Why?”

 

“I just explained why.”

 



 

“Because they are illegitimate.”

 

“Then what about their education…?”

 

“Well, that’s a matter for the future.”

 

“A matter for the future?”

 

“It means it’s too early to decide their fate. Just because they’re Gwen’s child doesn’t mean they can be formally recognized due to their mother’s poor lineage.”

 

“…Then why bring them here?”

 

“Just in case. Even if they’re only half-related, there might be a need to accept them as a family member depending on the situation. Especially since my mother is very thorough in these matters.”

 



 

“Leaving them out of sight and later having them come back with a claim to the family based on blood relations would be troublesome. It’s better to keep an eye on them from the start.”

 

In other words, because they were an illegitimate child, they were left without proper education. If legitimate heirs couldn’t take their place for some reason, the child would be a backup.

 

Considering the family’s honor and authority, it made sense. However, it was sad and bitter that the child, so small that their head barely reached her waist, lived in this vast mansion without proper care.

 

The child had definitely craved affection. They must have never received such attention, which is why they followed her around so eagerly. The more she thought about it, the more it bothered her.

 

“…I was just wondering, but.”

 

Stop.

 

She had to stop this unnecessary meddling here.

 

What right did she have to take care of someone else in her situation? She had no room for such leisure.

 

But her mouth wouldn’t stop.

 

“Would it be difficult for me to take care of the child?”

 

“Huh?”

 

Lisbell hesitated as she sat up. The warmth she felt from the child kept resurfacing, a feeling she thought she couldn’t experience in Altahart’s mansion.

 

“Even if it’s just basic education….”

 



 

“No matter the reason, leaving a child like that is… too pitiful.”

 

Her heart pounded. Her hands and feet felt cold. Her body, exposed due to the fallen blanket, didn’t cause this chill. It was the anxiety within her.

 

She thought it might be presumptuous. If Ulrich felt the same, it would be disastrous for her.

 

She looked up, tense.

 

Ulrich, staring at her with an unreadable expression, chuckled softly.

 

“You said your dream was to be a teacher… You must really like children, Lisbell.”

 



 

“Or is it a sign that you haven’t given up on your former fiancé?”

 

“Huh?” he tilted his head lazily.

 

Lisbell’s shoulders tensed.

 

The forgetfulness that the dire situation urged always came back because of him. Ulrich would sometimes bring up her past with Theodore. Even though she knew it was just a means to mock her, it was hard to stay indifferent.

 

Because it brought back everything from that day.

 

The misunderstanding that she had an affair with Ulrich, which had hurt Theodore’s feelings deeply.

 

The back of her neck itched again. It felt like dozens of insects were crawling up from her feet, gathering in one spot, twisting her nerves and giving her goosebumps. Feeling her neck growing cold, Lisbell clutched it.

 

Then, he spoke.

 

“It seems difficult. The child is under my mother’s jurisdiction.”

 

“…Can’t you persuade her?”

 

“Your assumption is wrong. I have no intention of persuading my mother in the first place.”

 



 

“No need for such useless efforts.”

 

Despite half expecting this, her heart sank. It felt like a footprint, as if someone had stepped on her heart. Disappointment welled up.

 

Ulrich turned away, as if that was the end of the conversation. While she was left in despair, he continued to review his documents as if nothing had happened.

 

Listening to the sound of pages turning, Lisbell turned her head. On the mantelpiece of Carrara marble was a neatly placed letter. It was the one she had written for the day before she fell asleep.

 

“…Then what about me?”

 

Her voice was dry and rough like a drifting sandstorm.

 

“What am I supposed to do?”

 

She lived each day feeling suffocated by helplessness. She couldn’t even meet her original target, her mother, and all she could do was write a daily letter, uncertain if it would ever be properly delivered.

 

Maybe she saw a reflection of herself in the neglected child. They were both in positions where they had to remain here, even though they were deemed useless for now.

 

That helplessness and loneliness.

 

The pitiful feelings she had to endure repeatedly.

 

“Are you telling me to do nothing? I’m a living person. I have a will and I breathe. So I can’t just do nothing. If that’s what you really want, you should have brought a corpse that can’t move.”

 



 

“Or do you want to make me like that?”

 



 

“Do you really… want me to wither and die?”

 

Ulrich turned to her again. His gaze, deeper than usual, erased his usual relaxed demeanor. Perhaps that’s why it felt so cold. That chilling gaze wandered over Lisbell’s tense face.

 

He clicked his tongue and stood up. His long legs quickly brought him to the bed, where he grabbed Lisbell’s chin and lifted it. She didn’t want to follow his arrogant gesture, but she couldn’t resist his strength.

 

“I find this side of Lisbell very annoying.”

 



 

“But also amusing….”

 



 

“I don’t know whether to find it cute or bothersome.”

 

Her neck itched terribly. Lisbell grabbed his wrist.


However, he couldn’t separate himself from me.

 

My mind went blank at the sight of the man’s gleaming eyes right in front of me. They were terrifying, as if one wrong step could lead to a cliff edge. Eyes that seemed to burrow into my mind and consume my brain whole. Lisbell held her breath in front of those piercing eyes.

 

“I don’t want to make you a corpse just yet, so let’s speak kindly to Mother.”

 

He slowly bent his upper body.

 

His sculpted lips gently brushed against Lisbell’s. Though it was a part of a warm human body, all Lisbell could feel was a cold, bleak chill. Despair and pessimism, which she had often felt, came alive vividly.

 

Not long after, their lips parted with a faint sound.

 

When the distance between them increased, his eyes returned to their previous weight. Ulrich, eyes filled with a rough playfulness, let out a short chuckle and kissed Lisbell’s pale cheek.

 

As he moved away, he muttered softly.

 

“Strangely, it feels like I lost this time.”

 

***

 

“Here it is.”

 

The concise butler bowed and then turned away. Watching the departing figure, Lisbell turned her head.

 

It was the door to a room she had never visited before.

 

It had been a week since she had reluctantly brought up the topic of the child. Today, she was finally going to meet the child officially. Ulrich had somehow succeeded in persuading his Mother.

 

Lisbell placed her hand on the door.

 

As she stayed still, everything around her became as quiet as a dead mouse. Aside from the departing butler, there were no other signs of life.

 

She sincerely wanted to care for the child.

 

To ignore the child that everyone had abandoned felt like abandoning herself. It was almost like an act of suicide.

 

If she had ignored the uncomfortable feeling that habitually squeezed her chest, her deepening blue depression would have only grown worse.

 

But that wasn’t the only reason.

 

The letter that had mysteriously disappeared from the mantelpiece this morning.

 

Lisbell realized that her range of activities had significantly shrunk since moving to the capital. She met no one, and her daily routine was monotonous. Everything was limited to the point where it could be easily defined.

 

This couldn’t go on.

 

Due to Ulrich’s busy schedule, her meetings with Mother were continuously postponed.

 

But she couldn’t let herself get used to it.

 

However, expanding her range of activities was frightening. She wondered if even this was part of Ulrich’s meticulous plan, given his ability to make her feel the value of her name.

 

He was currently Mother’s guardian, and she didn’t want to arouse any unnecessary suspicion. Offending him would not bring any beneficial results.

 

For now, she needed to go along with the situation.

 

She needed to be careful and expand her range without being noticed. The most plausible way to do that was to teach the child. It provided a reasonable excuse to move around the mansion and potentially gather information related to Mother.

 

Creak.

 

She gently pushed the door open.

 

The bedroom, with its neatly arranged furniture and fixtures, felt bleak despite its tidiness. It felt like a sterile, businesslike environment rather than a space maintained with affection. It was similar in structure to Ulrich’s bedroom, but slightly different in that aspect.

 

As she stepped inside with difficulty.

 

Crash!

 

The child, sitting at the table and having a late meal, dropped the fork. The child, thinking it was a servant, looked up and was visibly surprised to see her.

 

But that wasn’t what caught Lisbell’s attention. The child’s situation of having to eat in such a hidden place was very similar to hers.

 

The stiff child soon came to life. Without thinking about picking up the fork, the child got off the chair and hid behind the bedpost. The cautiousness was consistent.

 

Lisbell didn’t rush the child. She lowered her posture to match the child’s eye level, just as she had done in the hallway. She smiled slightly without taking her eyes off the child. The child, who was awkwardly trying to hide behind the thin post, blinked.

 

Lisbell waved her open hand side to side. At her greeting gesture, the child hesitated but eventually mimicked it. Seeing the small hand, Lisbell smiled even brighter.

 

Seeing the wary expression on the child’s face slightly relax, Lisbell gestured for the child to come closer. The child hesitated, moving tentatively, as if afraid of being watched.

 

Finally, the child was close enough for Lisbell to touch. Slowly, she reached out and patted the side of the child’s head. The child flinched but didn’t pull away.

 

“Hello.”

 

“….”

 

“What’s your name?”

 

The child shook their head again.

 

“Don’t want to tell me?”

 

“…No.”

 

“What?”

 

“Don’t… have one.”

 

Don’t have a name?

 

The confusion in her mind quickly turned to cold clarity. This too was a form of neglect. No matter how indifferent they were, how could no one give the child a name? A name was fundamental to a person’s identity. It was chosen with care for the hope that it would play a role in the person’s life.

 

In other words, the people in this mansion didn’t care enough to be inconvenienced by the lack of a name for the child.

 

It wasn’t just a materially different world. This place, at the top of the Altahart pyramid, was a space where even the basic humanity expected in people had dried up.

 

“I’m going to take care of you for a while. We’ll be seeing each other every day.”

 

At the unexpected news, the child’s eyes widened.

 

“But without a name, it will be very inconvenient for us. So… I’ll give you a name. Is that okay?”

 

The child hesitated before nodding cautiously.

 

Lisbell thought for a moment. She remembered the orphanage in Misley where she had once stayed. There had been a child who arrived without a name, much like this child. The headmaster had gone to the church and received several names from the pastor.

 

“How about Noah?”

 

One of the names that had been considered but ultimately not given came to mind. As she gently suggested it, the child’s eyes widened with excitement. The child then jumped into Lisbell’s arms, whispering softly, “I like it.”

 

Lisbell patted the child’s head.

 

The warmth she felt was almost pulsating. It was the first time since coming to this mansion that she forgot the itch in her neck.

 

***

 

Noah was kind and innocent. It seemed it was the first time he received someone’s attention, and although he often didn’t know how to respond, he showed genuine joy. The pure aspects of a child were incredibly endearing.

 

The lessons always took place in Noah’s bedroom.

 

Although Noah was five, he lacked basic education and knowledge. Currently, he was treated worse than dust in the household due to his illegitimate status, but there might come a time when he would need formal education.

 

If that happened, as a noble of high birth, he would likely be sent to a prestigious public school. While gathering books for teaching, Lisbell learned that Ulrich had also attended such a school, increasing the likelihood of this scenario.

 

The more she thought about it, the more she was appalled by the family’s coldness.

 

If that time came, uneducated Noah would struggle to keep up with the other children, causing him great confusion. Yet, judging by their attitude, the household seemed to expect Noah to endure such difficulties on his own.

 

“It’s too cruel.”

 

In that case, he might have been happier living with the mother he never knew. Lisbell realized that blood ties alone were not enough for happiness.

 

Carrying the materials for the lessons, she headed to Noah’s room.

 

“You’ve decided to take care of that child?”

 

The sudden voice startled her. It came from the top of the stairs she was about to descend.

 

Lisbell gathered the items in her arms and looked up at Julian, who was smiling at her. Since their last meeting, his smile had felt increasingly disconcerting.


“Madame’s consent came as quite a surprise.”

 

Step by step, like an actor continuing a play, Julian descended gracefully and stood in front of Lisbell.

 

“Madame rarely reverses a decision once made. So naturally, I thought convincing the second young master would be impossible.”

 

“…Do you have business with me?”

 

Julian shrugged at Lisbell’s tone, which could be perceived as curt by some.

 

“Business? Nothing grandiose. I just thought we might as well introduce ourselves since we ran into each other. After all, both you and I are the lovers of this household’s members.”

 

Lisbell’s fingers tightened around the book she was holding, turning white.

 

“I am not like that. Don’t compare me to you.”

 

“Really?”

 

Julian tilted his head in apparent surprise.

 

“From what I saw in the dining room before, that didn’t seem to be the case.”

 

He pointed to his neck with a strange smile.

 

“Completely covered in bite marks.”

 

The memory of that day flashed back. It wasn’t the first time she had been pointed out. Madame Altahart had also expressed disapproval with a glance at her neck as she left the dining room. Lisbell instinctively covered her neck, which had healed considerably since that day.

 

“We’ll be seeing each other often. It would be awkward just to nod every time, don’t you think? Knowing each other’s names wouldn’t hurt. So, what’s your name? I’m Julian. Julian Scott.”

 

“…Julian, I’m sorry, but I’m really not like that. I’m just here because of a weakness I couldn’t avoid.”

 

She hadn’t intended to converse with him at length, but the assumption that she was unmistakably Ulrich’s lover made her slightly indignant.

 

No matter how much she thought about it, their situations were clearly different. Just remembering the dining room was enough. She had looked like she was being dragged to the slaughterhouse, while Julian comfortably stayed by Madame’s side, dutifully serving her. Though likely for monetary compensation, Julian seemed to have willingly become her lover.

 

Not being in that position, Lisbell’s rebuttal was clumsy.

 

“Weakness? What weakness?”

 

As soon as she saw Julian’s reaction, Lisbell realized her mistake.

 

She bit her lip. Julian’s smile faded as he saw her obvious discomfort.

 

Soon after, he spoke as if in admiration.

 

“The second young master… caught your weakness? My goodness, the great Ulrich did such a senseless thing? A man even married women lined up to be with?”

 

She felt her stomach twist. Julian’s insinuation that Ulrich’s feelings were special for treating her differently from others made her nauseous.

 

“Is your business done? Then I’ll be going.”

 

“Oh, wait. Hold on.”

 

As she hurried to leave, Julian grabbed her arm. When Lisbell looked at him with displeasure, Julian raised both hands in a gesture of surrender.

 

“At least tell me your name before you go. I told you mine.”

 

Sighing, she realized he wouldn’t let go until she told him her name.

 

“Lisbell Osborne.”

 

“Lisbell, Lisbell Osborne.”

 

Julian repeated her name as if memorizing it, then smiled meaningfully.

 

“If you ever need my help, feel free to ask.”

 

“…You’re quite friendly for someone who’s practically a stranger.”

 

“Living under the same roof, we might have to rely on each other sometimes.”

 

Why should that be necessary?

 

Though she couldn’t agree with his logic, she didn’t argue. The more time she spent there, the stronger her desire to leave became.

 

Lisbell nodded curtly and turned away. Glancing back as she walked down the corridor, she saw Julian still watching her. Ignoring his wave, she turned her face forward.

 

As she headed to Noah’s room, she reflected on her conversation with Julian.

 

“Madame rarely reverses a decision once made. So naturally, I thought convincing the second young master would be impossible.”

 

In fact, Lisbell had also been surprised when she heard Madame had given her permission. It wasn’t beneficial for them in any way.

 

Whether due to harsh reality or cold intentions, it was clear they intended to neglect Noah. Keeping him under the family’s control, either for care or surveillance, and discarding him when he became useless was likely their plan. In that sense, they probably felt fulfilling their duty by just providing for Noah’s basic needs.

 

“Such a useless task.”

 

Even Ulrich had said so himself.

 

So it was puzzling. Why would Madame allow something that wasn’t beneficial to them? And how had Ulrich persuaded her?

 



 

Lisbell paused, looking out at the sunlit window.

 

Is there a reason to dwell on it?

 

Thinking too much would only give her a headache. Adapting to the given situation and finding a way to survive was the best she could do.

 

She was destined to leave this place someday. More interest or curiosity was a luxury. A herbivore wondering about a predator’s thoughts would only end up being devoured.

 

Letting go of her thoughts, Lisbell headed to Noah’s room.

 

Behind her footsteps, the sunlight shimmered indifferently.

 

At the same time, the sunlight pouring into the mansion equally illuminated a hotel in the city center.

 

Rubbing his eyes strained from a long meeting, Ulrich entered the tea room in the hotel lobby, adjusting his cufflinks.

 

“Mother?”

 

“She’s already arrived.”

 

Just as Victor reported, his mother was already in the tea room. However, she wasn’t alone. Ulrich’s steps halted.

 

As if reading his movements, Daphne, sitting next to his mother, turned her head while lifting her teacup. Her golden eyes lit up with delight upon seeing him.

 

“Ulrich, come here.”

 

Damn.

 

Realizing he had been deceived, Ulrich let out a small laugh. He wanted to leave immediately, but there were already eyes on him. Being the owner of this hotel and a man of renowned reputation, it wasn’t unusual for him to draw attention.

 

Unable to turn back, Ulrich eventually sat at their table.

 

“The meeting ran long, so I’m a bit late. If you were alone, I might have apologized, but since you have company, it seems unnecessary.”

 

“An apology would suffice, but why don’t you greet Miss Schwaben first?”

 

At his mother’s prompting, Ulrich finally looked at Daphne. Sitting primly like a noble lady, Daphne met his gaze. Ulrich nodded slightly with a formal smile.

 

“It’s been a while, Ulrich.”

 

“Indeed. I never imagined you would be spending time with my mother.”

 

“Surprised by my unannounced visit? Yesterday, Madame invited me to have tea with her, and I was delighted to come.”

 

“It seems so.”

 

Ulrich’s detached reply came with a polite smile as he ordered a coffee.

 

Something touched the back of his hand resting on the sofa armrest. Looking down, he saw Daphne’s delicate, white fingers. She was holding his hand.

 

“I’m sorry about Gwen.”

 

The intimate touch and sincere expression seemed calculated but quickly felt impulsive. Her touch felt subtly sticky.

 

By noble standards, it wasn’t polite. Touching someone without permission was unacceptable. But Daphne Schwaben was never one to think that deeply.

 

Ulrich smirked, finding her consistent.

 

“Are you sincere?”


